


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









﻿



U.S. Trust Art Services


















1.800.U.S.TRUST
Have Us Contact You
Find an Office Near You
Client Login


GO
















Home
About Us
Our Capabilities
Our Latest Thinking
Account Access







U.S. Trust Art ServicesSolutions for Individuals and Institutions
Hear From Evan Beard





x



Key Art Services Capabilities

Art Lending–helps collectors unlock the capital of their collection
Art Planning–prepares collectors to establish a legacy for their collection
Nonprofit Services–assists institutions with investment and endowment management
Consignment Services–helps collectors arrange negotiation and distribution of works

 



At U.S. Trust, we offer our extensive art services. We provide solutions for collectors and institutions while helping to navigate the complex art world. For individuals, we lend against collections to unlock capital, design estate plan options specific to art, and help collectors prepare for a sale via consignment services. For institutions, we provide nonprofit advisory services, including institutional investment management by a fully outsourced Chief Investment Office. Our range of capabilities helps us deliver a broad combination of services to our clients.  In addition, we are proud to be a part of Bank of America’s commitment to the arts, which helps us make an important connection to the communities we serve. 
				To learn more, visit bankofamerica.com/arts.  Read More



Contact Us




Evan Beard
National Art Services Executive
646.855.1107
Email











 




Art Lending

Helps collectors unlock the capital of their collection




Art Lending
Leverage your collection to unlock capital.
Your art collection is a considerable financial asset that can lend flexibility to your overall wealth management strategy. Borrowing against the value of your art collection may help you access liquidity, raise capital, or reallocate and diversify your portfolio. Plus, what you might pay in interest on an art-related loan is generally less than the fees for an unsecured loan.


Key Art Lending Services

Can convert a static asset into one of economic value
Our third party appraisers ensure an objective appraisal
You maintain possession of pledged artwork
Dedicated team of credit specialists focus on art

 





x






video
Leveraging Your Art Collection
with Evan Reed







x






video
Art as a Source of Liquidity
with John Arena









pdf
Your Art Collection as Loan Collateral




 


TOP





Art Planning

Prepares collectors to establish a legacy for their collection




Art Planning
Plan for the future of your collection.
Art can create estate planning and legacy opportunities—as well as challenges—that are important to consider. We help you think of your collection as part of your legacy through trust, estate and philanthropic planning, with the goal of maximizing your—and your art’s—appreciation.


Key Art Planning Services

Establish your legacy through trust, estate, and philanthropic planning with our dedicated wealth strategists
Obtain guidance on managing your collection as part of your financial assets
Incorporate art and collectibles into your overall estate and financial plan according to your unique needs

 







pdf
Your Art Collection and Legacy Planning










article
Art in a New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as a part of an overall financial portfolio.
by Ian Prior



 


TOP





Nonprofit Services

Assists institutions with investment and endowment management




Nonprofit Services
Work with U.S. Trust to manage your organization’s investments or endowment.
Arts organizations and private and artist-endowed foundations which support the arts are often challenged with managing many aspects of their businesses, from investing philanthropic capital, to determining effective grantmaking strategies and other governance best practices. U.S. Trust delivers long-term, strategic planning and solutions to support arts institutions in carrying out their missions.


Key Nonprofit Services

Consultative services for governance, grants and donor strategies, and board relationships
Complete outsourced Chief Investment Office (OCIO) and endowment management services
Broad spectrum of lending and strategic planning solutions

 







article
Art in a New World
As public funding declines and competition for donations increases, arts organizations are increasingly expected to play by for-profit rules.
by Ian Prior









pdf
Considering and Selecting an OCIO




 


TOP





Consignment Services

Helps collectors arrange negotiation and distribution of works




Consignment Services
Arranging for the disposition of works and collections.
Whether a collector, heir, or institution prefers to sell one work or an entire collection, U.S. Trust can assist in arranging consignment agreements with auction houses, making our pre-negotiated terms available to you and streamlining the overall process.


Key Consignment Services

Our pre-negotiated terms can help maximize the value of your transaction
For very valuable collections, we will receive competitive bids from the auction houses and lead negotiations
We will help you consider seasonality and cyclical nature as well as trends in the art market before engaging in a consignment agreement

 






ninja











article
Art in a New World
Rising wealth, the globalization of markets and technological advances are transforming the art market
by Ian Prior



 


TOP







Contact us






Contact Us
Get in touch with our expert for all your art-related needs.
Evan BeardNational Art Services Executive
646.855.1107
Email



Share











TOP






Investment Management
Wealth Structuring
Credit & Banking
Working with U.S. Trust
Press Room








Connect with us:












Investment products: 
    					Are Not FDIC Insured
Are Not Bank Guaranteed
May Lose Value

Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.



Bank of America Home
Privacy & Security

Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC.  Equal Housing Lender
© 2017 Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.














U.S. Trust - Our Latest Thinking




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login

























Our Latest Thinking











Identifying the main drivers of long-term change is key to investment success in the 21st century. We believe we are at the beginning of a secular growth phase for the U.S. economy driven largely by the rebalancing of global growth from the developed to the developing world. We focus on the long-term drivers, the macro forces and investment themes at play across industries that are taking us into the next growth cycle.
Learn More






2017 Mid-Year ISO: The Tortoise and the Hare Cycle

Learn More









2017 U.S. Trust Insights on Wealth and Worth®
Our Survey results reveal common success traits that create a picture of modern day wealth in America.
Learn More









Reaping What We Compute
The Future of Technology in Agriculture
Learn More






Making It Your Mission
What values drive and inform your giving?
Learn More






Estate Administration in the Digital Era
Modern technology and antiquated statutes can present estate administrators with unexpected challenges.
Learn More






Highlights from the 2016 U.S. Trust® Study of HNW Philanthropy
Our study reveals a passion for philanthropy but also uncertainty about the impact.
Watch The Video






Capital Acumen Issue 32
 The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as part of an overall financial portfolio.
Learn More






Art in a New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as a part of an overall financial portfolio.
Learn More






The Growing Adoption of Wind Power
 The wind power industry is expected to deliver rapid job growth over the next decade.
Learn More






THE OWNER'S EMOTIONAL JOURNEY
 Lessons Learned Before, During and After the Sale of a Business 
Learn More






2017 Viewpoint: Shifting winds
Navigating Uncertainty with Specialty Assets
Learn More






Market Insights You Can Act On
Having the ability to have a pulse on what's going on around the world is absolutely critical.
Watch The Video









Alternative Energy: Powering a Brighter Future
Conventional sources are expected to continue to dominate the energy mix as the world moves toward a low-carbon economy
Learn More






Technology Is Disrupting Everything—Even Sneakers
CIO Chris Hyzy looks at game-changing innovation across industries and the often unexpected investment opportunities it's creating
Watch The Video






Sci-Fi M.D.: Moore's Law Meets the Hippocratic Oath
With technology generating futuristic advances, look for investment opportunities within healthcare — and beyond
Learn More






The Ripple Effect of Brexit
The repercussions of the UK's vote point to an uncertain future across the Eurozone and elsewhere.
Learn More






New Administration, New Realities for Investors
Optimism about the impact of President Trump's potentially pro-growth policies accelerates tectonic shifts in the markets.
Learn More






Five Investment Themes for 2017
Global equity markets are ending the year on a high note with solid gains for the fourth quarter so far in the U.S., Europe and Japan.
Learn More






PRESIDENT TRUMP: WHAT HIS TAX PROPOSALS COULD MEAN FOR YOU
Mitch Drossman discusses what tax-planning steps individuals and corporations should consider.
Watch The Video






The 2016 U.S. Trust® Study of High Net Worth Philanthropy 
Who's Giving to Which Causes and Why
Read More






Don't Fight the Fed
Despite unfavorable predictions from many economists, a stable dollar and the Federal Reserve's cautious stance seem to have staved off a global recession.
Read More






Investing in Iran: Roses or Thorns?
 In a nation newly open to foreign commerce, we find an abundance of investment opportunities — and caveats
Read More






In Conversation With Jane McGonigal
Shall we play a game? The author and video game designer talks time, gaming and the future.
Read More






IMPACT INVESTING: PEOPLE, THE PLANET AND PROFIT
As Impact Investing Comes Of Age, Investors Can Finally Seek a Better World and Return on Investment.
Learn More






Can China's Economy Bounce Back
DeAnne Steele on the depreciation of the yuan, the changing focus of the Chinese economy, and what it all means for investors.
Read More







Business Owners: You, Your Family, and Your Business
Working with a global financial services company helps enable you to address — and simplify — both your business and personal financial lives.

Learn More  







 KEEPING PENSION FUNDING GOALS IN SIGHT
This white paper investigates the use of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) in pension funding strategies.
Learn More 






Investing for Maximum Impact
Today's investors are using their portfolios to change the world-without losing return potential
Learn More




 



Addressing Memory and Your Family
There is no cure for cognitive decline, but we have a partial solution: being prepared for the unexpected.
Watch The Video






Rebuilding America: The Road Ahead
U.S. roads and highways, bridges and power grids, and other critical infrastructure have fallen into dangerous disrepair.
Learn More






Timberland as a Sustainable Investment
Timberland offers an opportunity to pursue both—an environmentally sensitive investment platform and financial advantages.
Learn More







Jackie VanderBrug, an investment strategist at U.S. Trust, highlights why women are growing into an economic superpower
Learn More







Women and Climate Change
Jackie VanderBrug, an investment strategist at U.S. Trust, describes how women may be especially vulnerable to the effects of climate change
Learn More






Direct Real Estate Investing
Commercial real estate offers the potential for attractive yields, capital appreciation and valuable tax benefits.
Learn More






A fixed income investment approach designed to optimize after-tax yield and after-tax total return
Learn More






Experiences shared and lessons learned from entrepreneurs who successfully sold or transferred their businesses to family members.
Learn More









Intelligent Outsourcing
This white paper examines when the outsourced chief investment officer (OCIO) arrangement may be appropriate for an organization.
Learn More






The Power of Positive Teaching
Educating children about the responsibilities of wealth can help keep them wealth-smart.
Learn More





Mitch Drossman, U.S. Trust's national director of wealth planning strategies, discusses the midterm election results, their possible legislative impact, and the implications from a tax-planning perspective.
Watch The Video












Specialty Asset Management
Our Specialty Asset Management team can work with your portfolio manager and wealth strategist to integrate these real assets into your overall plan and portfolio.
Learn More






Transitioning America's Farmland
It's clear that over the next decade or so, much of America's farmland — now held or farmed by an aging generation — will need to be transitioned.
Learn More






From Best Practices to Next Practices
In search of long-term and sustained philanthropic impact.
Learn More






Making Specialty Asset Gifts Work for Your Organization
Without the proper planning, accepting gifts of real assets today can lead to unexpected and potentially costly consequences. Are you prepared?
Learn More






Women and Girls Equality Strategy
By applying a gender lens, investors can align their portfolios with the goal of supporting gender equality while seeking a market rate of return.
Learn More






The more successful and established entrepreneurs become, the more likely they are to want a more formal mechanism for giving.
Learn More






Family Wealth Services
Our comprehensive, values-based approach to meeting the wealth management needs of our clients and their families.
Learn More






The ElderCare Planning Program
We are committed to addressing the wealth management needs of our clients and their aging families.
Learn More






Personalized Banking and Credit
Your banking and credit needs deserve the same level of expertise as your investments.
Learn More






Customized Aviation Financing
Developing a financing strategy for your aircraft.
Learn More






Financial Empowerment
Prepare your children for the important financial opportunities that lie ahead.
Learn More






Financing a special and unique asset.
Learn More



 






 







Filter By:





Capabilities


Show All
Investment Management
Wealth Structuring and Planning
Credit & Banking




Topics


Show All

Tax Planning
Trusts and Estates
Non-Financial Assets
Philanthropy










Back to Top




AR-ARTPRMPV-EXP-2018.02.7























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






42286FFD (JCF*******803)



   







U.S. Trust - Investment Management




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login



























Investment Management
Insights, Strategies and Solutions
Our experienced professionals have expertise in a broad spectrum of traditional, alternative and non-financial assets.  We can work with you to develop and manage a portfolio tailored to your needs.






Portfolio Consulting
A collaborative dialogue with your portfolio manager
Your portfolio manager is a key member of your U.S. Trust relationship team and serves as your personal "chief investment officer." He or she will work with you to create an Investment Policy Statement, which serves as a blueprint for your portfolio by documenting your:

Objectives
Risk tolerance
Cash flow needs
 Tax situation
Wealth aspirations

Your portfolio manager's ongoing role is to incorporate our best strategic and tactical thinking, most relevant research analysis, current market insights and appropriate investment solutions into your portfolio. He or she will regularly monitor your portfolio to make sure it conforms to your Investment Policy Statement, which will be updated whenever there are significant changes in your life or goals.
Asset management
A more complete approach to asset allocation1
We analyze a wide range of asset classes, including hedge and private equity funds2 and global investment opportunities, as potential components of an asset allocation. In addition, we believe that true diversification requires managing for cash flows across and within asset classes in various market environments — not simply allocating according to a grid.
Your asset allocation will be based on the long-term expectations established for each asset class by our most senior investment professionals. Over the shorter term, however, your portfolio manager can adjust your portfolio tactically in response to emerging opportunities and risks, and reflecting U.S. Trust insights about trends and themes relevant to you.
How you own your assets — personally or in trusts; in taxable or tax-exempt solutions — can have a material impact on the overall performance of your portfolio. At U.S. Trust we focus on this wealth structuring aspect of your portfolio in conjunction with managing the assets themselves.
Alternative Investments
SOPHISTICATED SOLUTIONS TO MEET YOUR NEEDS2
Alternative investments at U.S. Trust focus on non-traditional assets such as:

Hedge funds
Private equity
Real estate and tangible assets

Because performance is often differentiated from equity and fixed income markets, alternative investments may be an ideal complement to traditional investments. 
Through our access to the industry's premier managers, we are able to offer solutions that provide options for all client segments. And we support you every step of the way with knowledge built on our experience in alternatives, including industry-leading research, rigorous due diligence, and cutting-edge portfolio construction.
Drawing from the experience, resources and expertise of the firm, you and your portfolio manager can explore alternative investments that can help you pursue what matters most to you.
Specialty asset management
Expertise in nonfinancial assets3
Specialty asset management at U.S. Trust focuses on nonfinancial assets such as:

Farm and ranch land
Timberland
Oil and gas properties
Private businesses
Real estate

Our Specialty Asset Management team can work with your portfolio manager and wealth strategist, as appropriate, to integrate these real assets into your overall plan and portfolio.
We can help you realize your objectives with assets you already own, or help you acquire specific assets to take advantage of their capital growth and diversification potential — whether you own these assets outright or they are held in trust.
Our team of specialists can provide complete turnkey services including identifying and purchasing real property and providing ongoing management.
Capital markets
Sophisticated market-linked solutions4
Through our access to the resources of Merrill Lynch, one of the world's leading capital markets participants, we can tailor approaches to risks and opportunities in the foreign exchange, interest rate, commodity and equity markets. Derivative-based transactions target the risks you seek to hedge, and are designed to dovetail with your overall portfolio and wealth management strategies.

1 Asset allocation and diversification do not ensure a profit or protect against loss in declining markets.
2 Alternative Investments such as derivatives, hedge funds, private equity funds, and funds of funds can result in higher return potential but also higher loss potential. Changes in economic conditions or other circumstances may adversely affect your investments. Before you invest in alternative investments, you should consider your overall financial situation, how much money you have to invest, your need for liquidity, and your tolerance for risk. Alternative investments are speculative and involve a high degree of risk.
3 Nonfinancial assets, such as closely-held businesses, real estate, oil, gas and mineral properties, and timber, farm and ranch land, are complex in nature and involve risks including total loss of value.  Special risk considerations include natural events (for example, earthquakes or fires), complex tax considerations, and lack of liquidity.  Nonfinancial assets are not suitable for all investors.  Always consult with your independent attorney, tax advisor, investment manager, and insurance agent for final recommendations and before changing or implementing any financial, tax, or estate planning strategy.
4 Brokerage services are provided by Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, a registered broker-dealer, Member SIPC and a wholly owned subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation.
Certain U.S. Trust associates are registered representatives with Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated ("MLPF&S") and may assist you with investment products and services provided through MLPF&S and other nonbank investment affiliates. MLPF&S is a registered broker-dealer, member SIPC and a wholly owned subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation ("BofA Corp."). U.S. Trust operates through Bank of America, N.A., and other subsidiaries of BofA Corp.
AR-ARY4G4DX-EXP-2017.06.17 






Videos:


Investment Management




Portfolio Construction



Fixed Income Solutions



Specialty Asset Manangement

View More Videos






You Might Also Be Interested In:

Wealth Structuring
Credit & Banking
Family Wealth Services
Specialty Asset Management
Institutional Investment Management
Philanthropy



Read Some of Our Latest Thinking

A Transforming World


Impact Investing




























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






42286FFD (JCF*******803)




   








Capital Acumen Online


































ISSUE 32: 2017



Follow us on:





Click here to send us your comments







Home
Features


Arts Special


Art in a New World


Arts Calendar 2017


Investment Spotlight


Anchored by Discipline and Patience


Future Perspective


Technology Gives Healthcare an Adrenaline Shot


Your Business


Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan


Philanthropy


Getting Your Giving Right


Global Insights


The Ripple Effect of Brexit



Our Insights


President's Letter


A Message From Keith Banks


Macro Analysis


Making Globalization Work for Everyone


Insights


Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It


Financial Empowerment: It’s a Woman Thing


Investment Outlook


New Administration, New Realities for Investors


In Brief


U.S. Trust Focuses on Impact Investing


Bank of America Commits to Carbon Neutrality by 2020



Archive

Issue 31: 2016
Issue 30: 2015
Issue 29: 2015


Videos


Private Wealth (Keith Banks)


Investment Management Video (Hyzy)


Art in a New World (Evan Beard)


2016 Wealth and Worth Video


Philanthropic Giving (Claire Costello)


Womenomics (Vanderbrug)


Women and Climate (Vanderbrug)


Do Municipal Bonds Make Sense (David Litvack Video)


What's the Outlook for fixed income post Brexit? (Chris Gunster Video)










In This Issue






A Message From Keith Banks

Read More





Art in a New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes.
Read More





Anchored by Discipline and Patience
The investment process at Schafer Cullen.
Read More





Technology Gives Healthcare an Adrenaline Shot
A future of opportunities.
Read More





Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan
5 steps to transfer or sale of your business.
Read More





Getting Your Giving Right
Philanthropic best practices can make charitable giving more impactful.
Read More





The Ripple Effect of Brexit
The repercussions of the UK’s vote point to an uncertain future — at least for the time being.
Read More





Making Globalization Work for Everyone
The benefits of globalization must be distributed more equitably.
Read More





Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It
Deferring income may be especially rewarding this year.
Read More





Financial Empowerment: It’s a Woman Thing
Women can bolster their financial acumen underutilized resource — each other.
Read More





New Administration, New Realities for Investors
The impact of potentially pro-growth policies.
Read More





U.S. Trust Focuses on Impact Investing
A primer, a web page and more.
Read More





Bank of America Commits to Carbon Neutrality by 2020
100% renewable electricity is part of the bank’s plan.
Read More



Back
More











Art in A New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as part of an overall financial portfolio.
Read more



Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan
5 steps to ensure that the transfer or sale of your business is right for you, your business and your family.
Read more



Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It
Imminent tax cuts could make deferring income especially rewarding this year. 
Read more



Getting Your Giving Right
Adopting philanthropic best practices can make one's charitable giving both more impactful and more satisfying.
Read more



Financial Empowerment: It's a Woman Thing
U.S. Trust seminars show that women can bolster their financial acumen by tapping a powerful but underutilized resource — each other.
Read more












Keith T. Banks
A message from Keith Banks
Read more



Christopher M. Hyzy
New Administration, New Realities for Investors
Read more



Mitchell A. Drossman
Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It
Read more



Karen Reynolds Sharkey
Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan
Read more



Rosemary Ringwald
Financial Empowerment: It's a Woman Thing
Read more



Evan Beard
Art in a New World
Read more



Robert T. McGee
Making Globalization Work for Everyone
Read more



Joseph P. Quinlan
Technology Gives Healthcare an Adrenaline Shot
Read more



Jackie Vanderbrug
U.S. Trust Focuses on Impact Investing
Read more



Karin Kimbrough
The Ripple Effect of Brexit
Read more


Our Experts:



























































Getting Your Giving Right





"Just as they would speak with a financial advisor about their investment portfolio, collectors can now turn to private banks like U.S. Trust to unlock capital from their collection."
—Evan Beard
National Art Services Executive, U.S. Trust
Read more


Technology Gives Healthcare a Shot of Adrenaline











Client Log In | 
          Find an Office Near You | 
          Have Us Contact You | 
          Our Capabilities |
          About Capital Acumen |
          Print Archive |
          U.S. Trust Home




Bank of America Home •
              Privacy & Security

Opinions expressed are subject to change. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
 The information and views are as of the date noted, are for informational purposes only, and are not intended to address the financial objectives, situation or specific needs of any individual investor. The information presented does not constitute, and should not be construed as, investment advice or recommendations. 
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.


Investment products:


 Are Not FDIC Insured 
Are Not Bank Guaranteed 
 May Lose Value


U.S. Trust operates through Bank of America, N.A., and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.
Bank of America, N.A. and U.S. Trust Company of Delaware (collectively the “Bank”) do not serve in a fiduciary capacity with respect to all products or services.  Fiduciary standards or fiduciary duties do not apply, for example, when the Bank is offering or providing credit solutions, banking, custody or brokerage products/services or referrals to other affiliates of the Bank. Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
© 2017 Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.AR57QL4V


















Arthena Fund 11, a series of Premier Art Investments, LLC - Pooled Investment Fund- Assure Fund Management Ii  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









Arthena Fund 11, a series of Premier Art Investments, LLC

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    2150 S 1300 E Suite 360 
    Salt Lake City, UT, 84106Phone: 8017133508 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2016-11-25


New


$81,500


$81,500


Other


06b 3C 3C.1


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 Llc Assure Fund Management Ii 
 Director 


 Jens Beyrich 
 Executive 


 Jeremy Neilson 
 Executive 














Art Investment Funds: The Basics | Center for Art Law





































































Center for Art Law





Center for Art Law Newsletter Blasts
Subscribe
 









Center for Art Law
Art and cultural heritage law aggregator.



Center for Art Law Newsletter Blasts
Subscribe
 


Log In 
Register Log in
Entries RSS
Comments RSS
WordPress.com 
 







Search for:





This slideshow requires JavaScript.

Contact FormContact Us
  Recent Posts 

Folding the White Cube: What Is Transforming the Gallery Scene in NYC?


Give and Take: on Jeff Koons mastering contractual and statutory relationships with other artists


Post Co-Authorship and Past Congeniality: Creative Relationship Spoils


Bring Me the Head of King David: Questions of Attribution and the Responsibility of Museums


 My TweetsTop Posts & Pages






								Law Firms							








								Art Law Courses and Programs Worldwide							








								Art Law Visiting the Non-profit Side: On Qualifying for 501(c)(3) Status as an Arts Organization							








								Internship/Fellowship Programs							








								ABOUT US							








								Art Investment Funds: The Basics							








								The European VAT: Good for Tax Revenue, Bad for the Commercial Art Market?							








								A Flag by other Name: Are there Traditional Ownership Protections Available to Iconic Cultural Symbols?							








								Events							








								Give and Take: on Jeff Koons mastering contractual and statutory relationships with other artists							



CategoriesCategories
Select Category
Aboriginal art
Advertising
advocacy
Alexander Calder
Alternative Dispute Resolution
Ancient Sites
Andy Warhol
ansel adams
Antiquities
Antiquity Law
appraisal
appraisers
art
art and law
art dealers
art fund
art history
Art Insurance
Art law
art law event
art law exhibition
art law history
art loans
Art Market
Artist Estates
artists
auction
Australia
authentication
Authentication Committee
authenticity
Babylon
Bankruptcy
Banksy
Banksy
Basquiat
BBC
Beatles
Bisons
Book Review
Boy George
British Museum
Brooklyn Museum
Business
Cady Noland
Caracas Museum
Cariou v. Prince
Carol Vogel
Case review
Cassirer
China
Christie’s
Christies
Clooney
Cologne
Columbia University
Conan Doyle
Conservation
Consignment Law
Contemporary Art
Contracts
Copyright
copyright litigation
Cornelius Gurlitt
Corporate Law
Costa Rica
Costner
Crimewatch
criminal law
Cuba
cultural elitism
Cultural Heritage
Cultural Property
culture
Culture Wars
Cyprus
Damien Hirst
Damien Hirst
Dance
David Ascalon
David Cameron
Deaccessioning
defamation
Delacroix
Denver Art Museum
Detmers
digital art
Discrimination
Displaced ARt
dispute resolution
DMCA
Dowd
Durham University
editorial
Edsel
Education
educational program
Egypt
El Museo del Barrio
Elgin Marbles
embargo
employment law
England
Estate Planning
Esther Hoffe
European Union
event review
Fair Use
Fairey
FBI
Federal Government
Film
film review
Finance
First Amendment
Fish and Wildlife Service
forgeries
Franz Kafka
Fraud
Freedom of Expression
French law
Freud
FSIA
Gagosian
Gagosian Gallery
Gauguin
George Grosz
German Cultural Heritage Law
Getty
gifts and donations
Google
graffiti
Gurlitt
Harper Lee
Hawass
Helly Nahmad
Henry Toulouse-Lautrec
Hermann-Neisse
Herrick Art Law
Honduras
Human Rights
Humanities
Hurricane Sandy
ICE
Icon
Immigration
Immigration Law
Indian Arts and Crafts Act of 1990
Infringement
Installation art
Insurance
Intellectual property
Internation Council of Museums (ICOM)
International
International Council of Museums
Internships
IP
Iran
Iraq
Irina Bokova
Islam
ISPs
job posting
Judith H. Dobrznski
Julian Falt
Kinetica Art Fair
Knoedler Gallery
Koh-i-noor Diamond
Kunsthal Museum
labor law
Larry Gagosian
Lee Wildman
legal aid
Legislative Efforts
legislative history
Leopold
Leslie Klinger
libel
Libya
Limbach Commission
litigation
Loans
looted art
Looting
Louvre
Luigi D’Amora
makeup
Mali
Marcello Fiori
Margarita Aguilar
Matisse
Max Brod
Metropolitan Museum of Art
Meyer de Haan
MFA
Michel van Rijn
Modigliani
MoMA
Monet
Money Laundering
Monuments Men
Moot
Moot Court
Movies
Musee Picasso
Museum
Museum Admission
Museum Director
Museum Funding
Museum of Modern Art New York
Museum Policy
Museum Security
Music
National Portrait Gallery
National Stolen Art File
Native American Art
Nazi
Nazi-era looted art
networking
New Jersey
New York
New York Arts & Cultural Affairs Law
New York City
non-compete clauses
NYState
Online
opinion
Oriental Museum
Otto Nauman Limited
Parthenon
patent law, IP
Patrick Cariou
Percent for the Arts
performing arts
Photography
Picasso
Pissarro
Poland
Pompeii
Pornography
Portrait of a Man with Akimbo
Portrait of Wally
Pre-Colombian
Preska
Privacy
Pro Bono
property dispute
Provenance
public art
Qing Dynasty
Queen Victoria
real estate
Red List for Endangered Cultural Objects
Rembrandt
Repatriation
Restitution
Restoration
Returnism
Richard Prince
Right of Publicity
Robert Motherwell
Romania
Rothko
Rotterdam
Rouart
Rowland
Russia
SAFE
Salander O’Reilly Galleries
Samuel Pinkus
Sanctions
Schiele
See Art Think Art Law
Seger-Thomscitz
seizure
Seminar
Sherlock Holmes
slander
social event
South America
Spain
Spotlight
Star Trek
statute of limitations
Steven Wynn
Stolen Art
Street Art
Sublime
Succession
Tate Modern
Tattoo
tax law
Taxes
Technology
textbook
The Dedalus Foundation
The Three Graces
Theft
Thompson
Thyssen-Bornemisza
To Kill a Mockingbird
Trade bans
Trademark
Trafficking
Trusts & Estates
U.K.
UN
Uncategorized
UNESCO
Union Contracts
Vandalism
VARA
Venezula
VIP Art Fair
Visual Artists Rights Act
Warhol Foundation
WIPO
Wish You Were Here
World Heritage
World War II


 







Posted on May 19, 2015May 25, 2015 by Jessica M. Curley
art, art fund, Finance



			Art Investment Funds: The Basics		


“It was well-choreographed, a beautiful show, but what was the financial truth?” Christian Ogier, Paris dealer commenting on one of the Christie’s auctions, May 2015.
By Jessica M. Curley*
Fine art is known to have little intrinsic value beyond its cultural significance and aesthetically pleasing nature, yet it seems to be an increasingly attractive alternative to traditional investment assets. The CEO of Blackrock, Larry Fink, recently remarked that one of the “two greatest stores of wealth internationally today is contemporary art,…” adding that, all jokes aside, it is a “serious asset class.” Although many art world enthusiasts advise that people only purchase art if they truly admire it, recent record high sales and huge upside potential are attracting the attention of those more focused on profit making. One mechanism utilized by some of these profit seekers to gain exposure can be found in fund-structured vehicles sometimes referred to as “passion funds.” These art investment funds, or “passion funds,” provide the opportunity for investors to tap into the potential of art works to diversify portfolios and potentially obtain significant returns. While some money managers have also taken interest in other niche asset classes including fine wine, vintage vehicles, stringed instruments, rare gems, and even comic books, this article focuses primarily on fine art.
Background & Market
Individuals and private clubs have been collecting fine art with varying degrees of investment intent for hundreds of years. However, the first institutional investor to specifically allocate capital for the purpose of investing in art is widely considered to be the British Rail Pension Fund, having acquired about 2,500 objects during the 1970’s for a total cost of about $70 million USD, close to 3% of the total fund. Institutional investing in art works has evolved since the 1970’s, resulting in the emergence of more and more funds exclusively dedicated to the asset class. The collapse of the dot-com bubble in 2001 also fueled the art fund trend as investors looked outside of the market for alternative opportunities. This trend of looking towards alternative assets was seen again following the financial crisis of 2008, as investors increasingly focused on tangible assets and alternative types of investment opportunities. Shortly thereafter, 2010 saw record sales of art works at both Christie’s and Sotheby’s, which further demonstrated the potential offered by fine art. More recently, in 2014 the global art market reached the highest level ever recorded, a total of over €51 billion.
Players
Managers of art funds are typically professionals from the financial industry, who have an interest and/or experience in the art world. They provide a number of crucial services including fundraising, investor relations, strategy development, market monitoring, and management of the disposition of fund assets. One notable example can be seen in Ron Perelman, billionaire businessman and art enthusiast, who established MAFG Art Fund for the purpose of investing in fine art, and who recently made headlines after getting caught up in a series of unfortunate  transactions (read more here).
Art fund investors generally have some kind of prior knowledge of the art market, and are largely looking to this type of asset for diversification and hedging purposes. To qualify to invest, they must be considered “accredited investors” under SEC guidelines, meaning that they are financially sophisticated individuals or institutions that require less protection than their unsophisticated counterparts. Institutional investors commonly include pension funds, trusts, family offices, insurance companies, endowments, and sovereign wealth funds, among others. For an individual to qualify for “accredited investor” status they must meet one of the following three criteria: (1) have a net worth exceeding $1 million, either individually or jointly with a spouse; (2) have an individual income in excess of $200,000 per year; or (3) have a joint income of $300,000 during each of the last two years and reasonably expect the same level of income moving forward.
Structure
Art funds are transactional in nature. They typically generate returns by strategic purchase and sale of artworks. In the US, art funds generally adhere to the traditional hedge fund structure of a limited partnership (typically in the form of a limited liability company (“LLC”)), which consists of a managing general partner(s), and a limited partner(s) who invest in the fund. Offshore funds can take on a number of more complex feeder/master fund formations, which also usually take on the form of a limited partnership, albeit with a wider variety of structuring options depending on source(s) of investment capital, taxation and accounting preferences. An open-ended fund scheme allows for the admittance of new investors and withdrawal of current investors throughout the life of the fund. More commonly used are close-ended funds, which, as the term implies, are closed to new investors once the fixed term to raise capital has ended. A third option consists of a hybrid model, which is more closely related to a close-ended fund, but which allows for some liquidity as investors can redeem shares after providing notice. Despite the likely existence of a withdrawal fee provision, the hybrid model boosts marketability since it provides for a quick exit for investors who do not like their capital locked up.
Once the structure is created and fund raising commences, a private placement memorandum detailing the objectives, risks and terms, including the investment minimum, of the offering is drafted and provided to potential investors. When an investor decides to invest, a subscription agreement detailing number of shares, price, and other terms will be executed resulting in the investor becoming a shareholder in the fund. One prominent art fund, the London-based Fine Art Fund Group, established in 2001, has six separate funds each of which is composed of an investment minimum of between $500,000 and $1,000,000 by 30 to 40 individual or institutional investors. Under some circumstances, investors may redeem shares, or sell to another accredited investor through a private placement, but this is typically limited or prohibited by the agreement terms.
Regulation
It is unknown exactly how many art funds exist today. Recently, Center for Art Law sat down with Enrique Liberman, President of the Art Fund Association, who has advised that there may be around 45 total funds worldwide. Most art funds are private investment vehicles, and as such are not subject to public disclosure and other burdensome regulatory requirements. Those art funds that are private investment vehicles must abide by the Regulation D private placement exemption requirements under the Securities Act of 1933 (the “33 Act”), which include limiting the offer to “accredited investors,” disclosing all material elements of the investment opportunity in a private placement memorandum and subscription agreements, and filing notice with the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) and with any relevant state regulators. To avoid being defined as an “investment company” under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (the “40 Act”), and thus subject to its additional set of regulatory burdens, art funds must qualify for one of two exceptions: having less than 100 investors or having up to 499 investors who meet the definition of “qualified purchasers.” Art funds are also subject to the anti-fraud provisions promulgated in the 33 Act, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the “34 Act”) and the 40 Act, which prohibit fraud in connection with the offer and sale of securities and in connection with advisory services. Art fund managers themselves must register as investment advisors with the SEC, under the 40 Act, if either they engage in significant leveraging and securities trading strategies, or the art fund exceeds the $150,000,000 threshold for “assets under management,” which are rare. Art fund managers may also need to register if required by state laws.
In contrast to the heavy regulation and transparency of the financial markets, the art market is currently burdened by little oversight. Art assets acquired by funds are not subject to the same level of investor protection measures as securities and other financial instruments. Aside from anti-fruad provisions, auction regulations, cultural property laws, and general consumer protection and contract law, not much regulation exists, which is a definite worry for some art market investors. James R. Hedges IV, financier and art collector, was quoted by the New York Times commenting on the state of art market regulation in that “the art world feels like the private equity market of the ’80s and the hedge funds of the ’90s…it’s got practically no oversight or regulation.” In the same vein, Nouriel Roubini, co-founder and chairman of Roubini Global Economics, has advised that the art market is prone to abuse through “routine trading on insider information,” and is used for money laundering and tax avoidance purposes.
Additionally, art funds tend to be discreet in their communications due to solicitation and advertising restrictions under Regulation D. Hence the scarcity of information available about the strategies, operations, and returns of art funds. Generally speaking, art funds may adopt broad investment strategies or alternatively may be more refined, for example, focusing on acquiring art of a specific genre or geographical region. Works from certain genres or regions can be more profitable than others due to a number of factors, including trends, cultural awareness, and economic growth and prosperity. For example, Post-War & Contemporary art has outperformed Impressionist and Old Masters for the last two decades according to the Mei Moses Fine Art Index, and has even outperformed the S&P 500 for the last ten years. Fine Art Fund Group CEO Philip Hoffman has advised that the firm began by investing in Old Masters, Impressionist, Modern and Contemporary Art, and have since expanded into “emerging art” genres. It has also been disclosed that the first two funds produced annual returns of 16 percent for sold pieces, a figure based on the sale of about 100 artworks.
More is known about fee structures than investment strategies. The two most common fees include a management fee of about 1 to 2 percent, and a performance allocation fee of around 20 percent of the net income of the fund per annum. Additional costs associated with art funds include traditional expenses incurred by collectors: commissions, buyer’s premiums, shipping, storage and insurance. That said, art funds generally try to avoid transacting through auction houses so as to avoid hefty sales commissions and buyer’s premium expenses. The Collectors Fund, based in Kansas City and established in 2006, manages between $20 and $30 million raised from around 100 investors each having contributed a minimum of $100,000. Once works are sold, a 20 percent management fee is skimmed from the net profits. From the remainder, 40 percent is distributed to investors, while 60 percent is reinvested and used to purchase additional works.
Pros & Cons
Art funds offer many unique advantages to investors. The value of fine art is generally uncorrelated with traditional financial markets, providing a means of diversifying portfolios, and hedging against market downturn and inflation. Art typically holds its value, especially on the higher end, and has consistent performance returns, which are very attractive characteristics to investors. Although the art market is subject to little oversight, actual art funds are subject to some financial industry regulation and must comply with initial and periodic disclosure requirements, and antifraud provisions, which provide some level of investor protection. Art fund managers also have a fiduciary duty with regard to their investors, which is virtually non-existent in gallery-investor or auction house-investor relationships. Additionally, fine art has an inherent appeal as a luxury good, and depending on the fund, may be loaned out to investors for personal use.
One potential drawback of art fund investing is that traditional financial modeling does not generally work due to the unique nature of art works and trends in the art market. For investors who are accustomed to relying at least partially on traditional models, this may cause some discomfort. Another concern is that art funds require professionals who can strategically advise on the purchase and sale of art works; however, this is a difficult skill to qualify as past performance is often hard to measure. Limited liquidity is a major issue facing art fund managers and investors; art must be sold according to market trends in order to maximize returns, which may not coincide neatly with the close of a fund. Furthermore, as previously mentioned, unlike the financial markets, the art market is highly unregulated leading to less investor confidence in fair dealings, and more potential for price fixing and manipulation. The issue of valuation presents another problem for art funds as the value of acquired works remain that of the purchase price, not accounting for any shifts, until there is a liquidity event, making it hard to value a fund at certain benchmarks. Provenance issues, including forgery, looting events, and misattribution, are also pervasive in the art world and may arise if proper research is not carried out prior to purchase. To this end, title insurance may be purchased to protect a fund against a murky provenance.
Looking to the Future
As the interest in fine art investing continues to increase, new variations of the art fund are popping up, providing new ways for investors to access the art market. One such variation is Arthena, the first equity crowdfunding platform that allows investors to pool their capital in “collections” which are curated by expert art advisors. The minimum investment per collection starts at $10,000 providing access to a much broader group of investors than the typical art fund, with a floor of upwards of $100,000.
The art investment industry has also seen a recent trend of investors moving away from art funds and towards privately managed art investment accounts. This allows investors to avoid co-mingling their capital and provides the opportunity to customize the objectives and strategies of the investment.
In addition to these alternatives, new products are in the pipeline that would provide other methods for investing in the art world. Missouri based Liquid Rarity Exchange plans to bring one such product to market in the next few years, which will consist of publicly traded shares of securitized art and other tangible and intangible alternative assets. Shower Zhang, Director of Strategic Planning, has advised that in one interesting scenario, the owner of an art collection, be it an individual or institution, can essentially bring the collection to market through an IPO process, governed by standard SEC regulations. The shares then being traded on the open market. Another product, this one emerging from the banking world, is a collateralized debt obligation (“CDO”) utilizing art loans as the underlying asset. A traditional CDO is a structured investment product that utilizes cash flow-generating assets, including mortgages, loans, bonds, and credit card debt, and bundles them into tranches that can be sold to investors. An art CDO would theoretically operate the same way, only using loans backed by art works as the underlying assets. The art lending business has grown significantly in past few years as banks, auction houses, and private lenders seek to provide this additional service for high net worth clients, and as such, it makes sense that financial institutions would create sophisticated ways to further monetize these loans. 
In conclusion, the subject of art funds has seen about as much enthusiasm as it has criticism from the financial industry. However, it is worth noting that what most people today consider mainstream alternatives (hedge funds, private equity and real estate) were not always considered to be so. This leaves open the possibility that art investment, and particularly art funds, may follow in their footsteps. In the meantime, those considering investing in an art fund are strongly advised to do their research and seek the advice of experts in the field.
Sources:

The Art Fund Association, http://www.artfundassociation.com/index.html
Cristina del Rivero, Art Meets Law in New York Times art securitization piece (Jan. 11, 2011) http://artmeetslaw.blogspot.com/search?q=securitization
Cynthia O’Murchu, Art: A Market Laid Bare, Financial Times (Apr. 7, 2015)
Daniel Grant, Dollars on the Wall? Art Funds Boom Along With Auction Houses, Observer.com (May 14, 2014, 2:58pm) http://observer.com/2014/05/dollars-on-the-wall-a-booming-art-market-attracts-investors/#ixzz3Zyu3C0XX
James B. Stewart, With Art, Investing in Genius, The New York Times (Nov. 28, 2014) http://www.nytimes.com/2014/11/29/business/with-art-investing-in-genius.html?_r=0
Katherine Markley, Q&A with Art Fund Association President Enrique Liberman, artnet news (Sep. 9, 2013) //news.artnet.com/market/q-amp-a-with-art-fund-association-president-enrique-liberman-48644
Kyle Sommer, The Art of Investing in Art, https://www.jpmorgan.com/pages/jpmorgan /is/thought/magazine/3Q2013/art
Madeleine Giansanti Cag, Want To Invest In An Art CDO? I’d Pass (Jan. 9, 2015, 3:30pm) http://abovethelaw.com/2015/01/want-to-invest-in-an-art-cdo-id-pass/
Marion Maneker, Blackrock’s Fink Validates Art as an Asset Class (Apr. 21, 2015) http://www.artmarketmonitor.com/2015/04/21/blackrocks-fink-validates-art-as-an-asset-class/
Marion Maneker, Mysterious Art Funds—and Why They’re That Way, Art Market Monitor (Mar. 11, 2015) http://www.artmarketmonitor.com/2015/03/11/mysterious-art-funds-and-why-theyre-that-way/
Mike Collett-White London, As art market booms, some see the risk of bust, Reuters (Feb. 3, 2011) http://www.reuters.com/article/2011/02/03/us-market-preview-idUSTRE7124B720110203
Noah Horowitz, Art of the Deal: Contemporary Art in a Global Financial Market (Aug. 31, 2014)
Robin Pogrebin and Kevin Flynn, As Art Values Rise, So Do Concerns About Market’s Oversight, The New York Times (Jan. 27, 2013) http://www.nytimes.com/2013/01/28/ arts/design/as-art-market-rise-so-do-questions-of-oversight.html?_r=0
TEFAF, Global art sales in 2014 break all known records (Mar. 11, 2015) recordshttp://www.tefaf.com/DesktopDefault.aspx?tabid=15&tabindex=14&pressrelease=16959&presslanguage=
Terry Trucco, British Pension Fund Sells $65.6 Million in Artworks, New York Times (Apr. 5, 1989) http://www.nytimes.com/1989/04/05/arts/british-pension-fund-sells-65.6-million-in-artworks.html

About the Author: Jessica M. Curley, Esq. (Cardozo ’14) is pursuing her interest in art law and financial regulation in New York. She served as the Spring 2015 Post Graduate Fellow with Center for Art law, and currently works in fund structuring at a large financial institution. She may be reached at jessicamcurley@gmail.com.
Disclaimer: This article is intended as general information, not legal advice, and is no substitute for seeking representation.
Share this:ShareClick to share on LinkedIn (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to email (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading...

Related
 





			2 thoughts on “Art Investment Funds: The Basics”		




 


Reblogged this on ARTSPEAK CENTRAL and commented:
Given the importance of Art to Humankind, quality Art will always be a good investment.







			Pingback: ABC’s OF ART FUNDS… | Russell Tether Fine Art 



Comments welcomed Cancel reply 



Enter your comment here...




Fill in your details below or click an icon to log in:



























 
 


Email (required) (Address never made public)



Name (required)



Website














 You are commenting using your WordPress.com account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Twitter account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Facebook account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Google+ account. ( Log Out / Change )




Cancel
Connecting to %s




 Notify me of new comments via email. Notify me of new posts via email.
 



 
















Post to



Cancel







 










Send to Email Address

Your Name

Your Email Address






Cancel

				Post was not sent - check your email addresses!			

				Email check failed, please try again			

				Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.			









 
%d bloggers like this:

















































































































































AthenaInvest - The Leader in Behavioral Portfolio Managment





















Behavioral Portfolio ManagementAIR LoginRecent Coverage
Subscribe





MARKETS ARE NOT EFFICIENT
AND
PEOPLE ARE NOT RATIONAL
AthenaInvest applies behavioral finance to build innovative investment solutions.LEARN HOW









                            Market Peaks: What Happens Next?
                            
                        
When the equity market sets a new all-time high, many people become anxious about what will happen next. It turns out that new market peaks are common, occurring 1,144 times from January 3, 1928 through May 31, 2017, or once a month on average.

READ MORE







                            The Active Equity Renaissance
                            
                        
The Active Equity Renaissance is a series of posts by AthenaInvest's Founder and CIO, C. Thomas Howard, PhD, and Jason A. Voss, CFA, retired co-Portfolio Manager of the Davis Appreciation and Income Fund. It proposes an alternative to modern portfolio theory (MPT), and pokes holes in MPT’s underlying assumptions. Ways to improve active management returns are discussed throughout.
Read the Series on Enterprising Investor 
READ MORE







                            The Wall of Worry
                            
                        
The last eight years have been a good period for equity investing. But can it last? As the old saying goes, “Markets climb a wall of worry.” There is certainly plenty to worry about: looming market corrections, elections in Europe, and political uncertainty.

READ MORE







                            From Plan to Portfolio
                            
                        
Advisors integrating planning into their practices face new challenges. Of critical importance is the advisor’s ability to translate client needs into financial solutions and to communicate how those solutions meet their goals. Needs-based planning builds confidence in the advisor and helps clients avoid costly emotional decisions which can sabotage long-term results.

READ MORE





Market Peaks: What Happens Next?
The Active Equity Renaissance
The Wall of Worry
From Plan to Portfolio
















VALUE

Concentrated equity portfolio managed with a unique combination of traditional value and behavioral approaches.







DIVIDEND

High-dividend equity portfolio managed with a unique behavioral approach.







TACTICAL

ETF managed portfolio designed to invest in the right market at the right time.







GROWTH

“Best of Athena” diversified equity portfolio managed with a unique behavioral investment approach.




















AboutCompanyThe TeamInvestmentsRecognition
LegalADV Part 2Privacy PolicyBusiness ContinuityTerms of Service
The LatestAthena ViewpointsRecent CoverageRecent Press Releases
Contact
AthenaInvest Advisors LLC
Phone:   (877) 430-5675Fax:        (303) 721-6294Email:     support@athenainvest.com




HomeInvestmentsSMA OverviewProduct AvailabilityManaged Accounts
Pure Valuation ProfitabilityDividend Income EquityGlobal Tactical ETFsManaged EquityViewpointsCompanyCompany OverviewThe TeamRecognitionContact UsAdvisor SiteSign InRegister




Mutual Funds
















































Mutual Funds: Overview
 



Symbol lookup




Wednesday, July 26, 2017 6:01:53 AM EDT

Show Me
|






 






Mutual Fund Overview
 



Symbol lookup



See How Easily You can Manage Your Mutual Funds at TD AmeritradeWe Have the Tools and Guidance You Need – and You'll Pay No Commissions on Thousands of Funds.Broad selection of no-transaction fee funds. Pay no transaction fees or commissions on thousands of mutual funds. Find top-rated funds, in every asset category, to match your goals with our easy-to-use screeners and comparison tools.Independent Morningstar Investment Management research. Not sure which funds are right for you? Make more informed decisions by turning to our Premier List, which features fund picks by Morningstar Investment Management.Knowledgeable service. Get the help you need, when you need it. Speak face-to-face with one of our branch associates. Or call our Investor Services team at 800-669-3900.TD Ameritrade Premier List Funds powered by Morningstar Investment ManagementTake some of the guesswork out of the mutual fund selection process.  Our Premier List features top picks* by independent experts at Morningstar Investment Management to help you pursue your investment objectives.For example, you could select an All-in-One fund to get instant diversification. Or you could build your own core/satellite portfolio using Core funds as your anchor and a complement of smaller “satellite” positions from the Primary and Advanced funds list.(Premier List Funds updated as of 06/30/2017)The Premier List of funds are carefully screened and analyzed by Morningstar Investment Management.Learn how the selection process works. Every quarter, independent experts at Morningstar Investment Management update the Premier List to ensure it contains only their top mutual fund picks*.Read moreRetirementDo you have a retirement account outside of TD Ameritrade? Roll-over your old 401k and open an IRA at TD Ameritrade.  No setup or maintenance fees and you'll have access to over 1,800 mutual funds with no transaction fees. Go to Retirement & PlanningExchange Traded Funds (ETFs)Invest in over 100 commission-free ETFs, chosen by Morningstar Investment Management's experienced investment professionals. Research ETFsInvesting 101Learn the basics of mutual funds and build a solid foundation of investment knowledge for years to come.Read articles:How to Choose a Mutual FundA look at Mutual Fund CategoriesWatch video tutorials:Understanding Mutual FundsMutual Fund Style AnalysisMutual Fund Commission and FeesTake a deeper dive:Sharpen your investing skills with more advanced video tutorials and coursesLoading...We Can Help YouOur investment specialists can answer your questions.Call 800-669-3900Find a branchFund Quick SearchesHighest Alpha(20)Highest Morningstar Rating(130)Income-Oriented Funds(47)Municipal Bond Funds(320)More Screens...Compare Mutual Funds Enter a symbol Or start with a popular symbol: MWTRX, JMCVX, PTTDX Compare to similar:  Mutual Funds ETFs Index Funds Closed End Funds CompareFind a Fund FamilySelect1290 Funds13D Management LLC1919 Funds360 Funds361 FundsAAMAasgardAbbey CapitalAberdeenABRAbsolute CapitalAbsolute StrategiesAC ONEAcadian FundsACMACR Alpine Capital ResearchAcuitas InvestmentsAdaltaAdam Asset FundsAdams Harkness FundsAdirondack FundsAdvantusAdvisorOne FundsAdvisors PreferredAdvisors' Inner Circle Fund IIIAdvisory ResearchAegisAffinityAIGAkreAl FrankAlambicAlgerAll Terrain FundsAllianceBernsteinAllianz FundsAllied AssetAlphaCentric FundsAlphaMarkAlphaOne Investment Services, LLCAlpineALPSAltegrisAmanaAmericaFirst FundsAmerican BeaconAmerican Century InvestmentsAmerican FundsAmerican GrowthAmerican IndependenceAmerican Money ManagementAmerican TrustAMFAMG FundsAMIDEXAnchorAncoraAnfieldAngel OakApex Capital ManagementAppleseed FundAQR FundsAquilaArabesque Asset ManagementArbitrage FundArcherAriel Investments, LLCAristotleArrow FundsArtisanAscendantAshmoreAspen PartnersAspiration FundsAspiriantAstorAT FundsATAC FundAthena FundAuerAuxier FundsAve Maria Mutual FundsAvenue Capital GroupAvondale FundsAzzad FundBaillie Gifford FundsBairdBalterBarings FundsBaron Capital GroupBarrettBarrow FundsBaywoodBBHBeck, Mack & OliverBeckerBeech HillBeeHiveBerkshireBernzott Capital AdvisorsBFSBiondo Investment AdvisorBishop StreetBlackRockBlackstoneBlue Chip Investor FundBlue Current FundsBMO FundsBNY Mellon FundsBogleBoston CommonBoston PartnersBoston Trust & Walden FundsBoyar Value FundBoyd Wattersonbp capitalBramshill InvestmentsBrandesBretton FundBridge BuilderBridgesBridgewayBright RockBroadview FundsBrookfield Investment FundsBrown Advisory FundsBrown Capital ManagementBruceBTSBuffaloBullfinchCalamosCaldwell & OrkinCalvert InvestmentsCambiar FundsCamelot FundsCampbell & CompanyCane Capital ManagementCanterbury Investment ManagementCapital AdvisorsCapital GroupCapital Guardian Trust CompanyCapital ManagementCardinal CapitalCastle Investment ManagementCastlemaineCatalyst Mutual FundsCausewayCavalierCavanal Hill fundsCBOE VestCCA FundsCedar RidgeCenterstone InvestorsCentre FundsCentury FundsCG fundsCGMChaconia FundsChadwick & D'AmatoChamplain FundsChanging Parameters, LLCChartwell Investment PartnersChaseChesapeakeChilton FundsChiron Investment ManagementChou AmericaChristopher Weil & Company, Inc.Cincinnati Asset Management FundsCity National RochdaleClark Fork TrustClarkston FundsClifford CapitalClipper FundCloughCM AdvisorsCMGCogniosCognios CapitalCohen & SteersCohoCollinsColumbiaCommerceCommonwealth Intl Series TrCommunity Capital ManagementCommunity Development FundConcordeConductorConestoga Capital AdvisorsCongressContext Asset ManagementConvergenceCook & Bynum Capital Management, LLCCopeland Capital Management, LLCCopleyCornerCapCornerstoneCortina Funds IncCounterpoint Mutual FundsCove Street CapitalCovered BridgeCozadCrawfordCredit Suisse (New York, NY)CRMCroftCrow PointCullen Funds TrustCutlerCVRDana InvestmentDavenportDavidson Mutual FundsDavis FundsDay HaganDDJDean FundDearborn Partners LLCDeer ParkDestinations FundsDestraDeutsche Asset ManagementDF Dent FundsDGHMDGIDiamond Hill FundsDimensional Fund AdvisorsDirexion FundsDodge & CoxDominiDoubleLineDreyfusDriehausDUNDASDunham FundsDuPontDupreeE-Valuator fundsEagle FundsEASEaton VanceEdgar LomaxEdgewoodEIP FundsElessar Investment ManagementEmeraldEmpiric FundsEnsemble FundEntrepreneurShares LLCEpiphany FundsEquinox Funds TrustEquity Investment CorpEquityCompassEstabrookEuro Pacific Asset ManagementEventide FundsEvermoreExceed InvestmentsFairholmeFAMFCI FundsFDP Series FundsFederatedFidelity InvestmentsFiera CapitalFirst EagleFirst InvestorsFirst Security FundFirst StateFirst TrustFirst Trust Portfolios L.P.First Western Capital MgtFirsthand FundsFisher InvestmentsFlippin, Bruce & Porter FundsFMC FundsFMI FundsFootprintsForesterFormulaFoliosFort Pitt Capital FundsFoundryFPAFrank FundsFranklin Templeton InvestmentsFreedom FundsFrontier FundsFrost FundsFulcrumFuller & ThalerFund XFX Strategy FundGabelliGatorGaveKalGE Asset ManagementGeneva AdvisorsGerstein FisherGinkgoGiralda FundGlenmedeGlobal View CapitalGMOGoehring & RozencwajgGoldman SachsGolubGood HarborGoodHavenGothamGQG PartnersGrandeur Peak FundsGranite HarborGranite Investment Advisors, Inc.Grant ParkGreat Lakes FundsGreat-West FundsGreen CenturyGreen OwlGreenspringGuggenheim InvestmentsGuideMarkGuidePathGuideStone FundsGuinness AtkinsonGurtinHamlin Capital Management, LLCHancock HorizonHanlonHarborHarding LoevnerHartford Mutual FundsHarvest FundsHatteras FundsHaverfordHaysHeartlandHedeker WealthHedgeRowHenderson GlobalHennessyHenssler FundsHighland FundsHighmoreHillman Capital ManagementHodgesHolbrook HoldingsHolland Series TrustHomesteadHorizon InvestmentsHotchkis & WileyHoward Capital ManagementHSBCHuber FundsHundredfoldHussman FundsHVIA Equity FundICM Series TrustICON FundsIMSIndependent Franchise PartnersIndex FundsIndexIQInfinity QInnealta CapitalInnovator FundsInsight InvestmentInsignia MacroIntegrityIntrepid FundsInvescoInvesco Capital Markets IncInvestment House LLCInvestment Managers Series TrustIron FundsIronBridge Funds, Inc.Ironclad FundsIssachar FundIVA FundsIvy FundsJackson SquareJacobJAG Capital Management, LLCJames AdvantageJanus HendersonJensenJOHCM FundsJohn HancockJohnson Mutual FundsJPMorganKaizenKCMKeeleyKellnerKempnerKineticsKirr Marbach PartnersKKMKnights Of ColumbusKopernikKP FundsLadder Capital CorpLadenburg ThalmannLateef Investment Management LPLaudus FundsLawson Kroeker Investment Management IncLazardLEADERLeavellLee Financial Group Hawaii, IncLegg MasonLeland FundsLeutholdLiberty StreetLinde HansenLitman Gregory Masters FundsLJM FundsLKCMLM CapitalLMCG FundsLoCorr FundsLogan CapitalLogan Circle PartnersLong ShortLongboardLongleaf PartnersLoomis Sayles FundsLord AbbettLSV FundLyricalMacquarie Investment ManagementMadison FundsMAIMain ManagementMainGate TrustMainStayMairs & PowerManaged Futures Solutions FundManning & NapierManor Investment FundsMarathon FundsMarketfield FundsMarketocracy FundsMarshfieldMarsico Investment FundMassMutualMatrix Advisors Funds TrustMatrix/LMHMatthew 25Matthews Asia FundsMcKee FundsMD SassMeasured Risk PortfoliosMeeder FundsMeehan FocusMeridianMeritage Portfolio ManagementMerk FundsMetropolitan West FundsMFSMH EliteMidasMiles CapitalMiller InvestmentMiller Value FundsMiller/Howard Funds TrustMirae Asset Global InvestmentsMOERUS FUNDSMoncapfundMondrianMonettaMonteagle FundsMorgan DempseyMorgan StanleyMotley FoolMP 63MT LucasMuhlenkampMundoval FundsMutual of AmericaMutualhedgeMuzinichNationwideNatixis FundsNavigator FundsNeedhamNeiman FundsNeuberger BermanNew AlternativesNew Century PortfoliosNew CovenantNewfoundNicholasNile Capital Investment TrustNorth Country FundsNorth StarNorthCoastNortheast InvestorsNorthern FundsNorthPointe FundsNorthquest Capital Fund IncNorthwoodNottinghamNuance InvestmentsNuveenNWM MomentumNysaO'Shaughnessy Mutual FundsOâ€™Shaughnessy Asset ManagementOak AssociatesOak Ridge FundsOakhurstOakmarkOaktree FundsOberweisOCMOld WestburyOlsteinOppenheimerFundsOrchard Capital ManagementOrinda FundsOsterweisOtter CreekPacific Advisors FundsPacific CapitalPacific FinancialPacific Funds Series TrustPalmer SquarePappParadigm FundsParnassusPatriotPax WorldPaydenfundsPayson FundsPear Tree FundsPenn Capital ManagementPerkinsPermanent PortfolioPerrittPersimmon Capital Management LPPhocasPIA Mutual FundsPiedmontPimcoPineBridgePinnaclePinnacle Capital ManagementPioneer InvestmentsPlan Investment FundPMC FundsPNC FundsPolaris FundsPolen CapitalPoplar Forest CapitalPort Street InvestmentsPortfolio StrategiesPotkul FundsPower Dividend Index FundPower Income FundPower Momentum Index FundPraxis Mutual FundsPreserver FundsPrice Asset ManagementPrimary TrendPRIMECAP Odyssey FundsPrincetonPrincipal FundsPrivate Capital ManagementProbabilities FundProFundsProspector FundsProvidentPrudential Funds (PGIM Investments)PSG FundsPutnamPzenaQuakerQueens Road FundsRainierRanger FundsRareview CapitalRational FundsRBB FundsRBC Global Asset Management.Reaves Select ResearchRedmontRedwoodRegalReinhartfundsREMSGroupRenaissance CapitalRESQ FundsReynoldsRice Hall JamesRidgeWorthRiver CanyonRiverbridgeRiverNorth FundsRiverPark FundsRMB FundsRNC Genter Capital ManagementRockefeller & Co.RooseveltRoxbury FundsRoyceRQSIRSQRussellRVXRWCRyan LabsRydex FundsSA FundsSalient FundsSands CapitalSaratogaSarofimSATUIT FUNDSSaturna CapitalSaturna Sustainable FundsSavos Investments TrustScharf InvestmentsSchneider FundsSchroderSchwab FundsSchwartzScotiaFundsScoutSeafarer FundsSegall Bryant & HamillSEISelected FundsSelectiveSemperSentinelSequoiaSextant Mutual FundsShelton Capital ManagementShenkman FundsSierra TrustSilverPepperSirius FundsSitSkyBridgeSmead FundsSmith GroupSnow Capital FundsSound MindSound ShoreSoundwatch CapitalSparrowSpirit of AmericaSpouting RockSTAAR Investment TrustStadion FundsState FarmState Street Global AdvisorsState Street Global Advisors (Chicago)Steben & CompanySteinbergSterling Capital FundsSteward FundsStone HarborStralem FundSummit Global InvestmentsSuperfundSwanSymonsT. Rowe PriceTanakaTarget ProgramTaylor Frigon Capital ManagementTCM FundsTCWTD Asset ManagementTebergTeton Westwood FundsTFS Capital FundsThird AvenueThomas White FundsThompson IM Funds IncThomson Horstmann & BryantThornburgThriventTIAA InvestmentsTilson FundsTimothy PlanTOBAM Core InvestmentsTocquevilleToews FundsTopturnToreadorTorrayTorray ResoluteTortoise Capital AdvisorsTortoise Credit StrategiesTouchstoneTowle & CoTransamericaTransWestern FundsTributary FundsTrillium Mutual FundsTrust for Credit UnionsTrust for Professional Mgrs(PTIA)TS&W FundsTurner FundsTweedy, BrowneTwo Oaks Investment Management, Inc.U.S. Global InvestorsUBS Asset ManagementUpright Investments TrustUSA MutualsUSAAUSCAVALICValue LineVan EckVan Hulzen Asset Management, LLCVanguardVericimetry FundsVictoryVikingVillereVirtusVivaldiVolumetricVontobelVoyaVulcan Value PartnersWaddell & ReedWakefield FundsWall StreetWalthausen FundsWasatchWasmer SchroederWavelength FundsWaycrossWBI FUNDSWCM Investment ManagementWeissWeitzWellington ShieldsWells Fargo FundsWentworth, Hauser and ViolichWesMarkWest ShoreWestchester CapitalWestcoreWestfield CapitalWestwoodWilbanks Smith & ThomasWilliam BlairWilliamsburg Investment TrustWilmington FundsWilshire Mutual FundsWintergreen FundsWirelessWisconsin Capital ManagementWOAWorld FundsWorld Funds TrustWorld Funds, IncWP TrustWrightYCG FUNDSYorktown FundsZacks FundsZeoZevenbergen Capital InvestmentsZieglerSelect1290 Funds13D Management LLC1919 Funds360 Funds361 FundsAAMAasgardAbbey CapitalAberdeenABRAbsolute CapitalAbsolute StrategiesAC ONEAcadian FundsACMACR Alpine Capital..Acuitas InvestmentsAdaltaAdam Asset FundsAdams Harkness..Adirondack FundsAdvantusAdvisorOne FundsAdvisors PreferredAdvisors' Inner Circle..Advisory ResearchAegisAffinityAIGAkreAl FrankAlambicAlgerAll Terrain FundsAllianceBernsteinAllianz FundsAllied AssetAlphaCentric FundsAlphaMarkAlphaOne Investment..AlpineALPSAltegrisAmanaAmericaFirst FundsAmerican BeaconAmerican Century..American FundsAmerican GrowthAmerican..American Money..American TrustAMFAMG FundsAMIDEXAnchorAncoraAnfieldAngel OakApex Capital..Appleseed FundAQR FundsAquilaArabesque Asset..Arbitrage FundArcherAriel Investments,..AristotleArrow FundsArtisanAscendantAshmoreAspen PartnersAspiration FundsAspiriantAstorAT FundsATAC FundAthena FundAuerAuxier FundsAve Maria Mutual..Avenue Capital..Avondale FundsAzzad FundBaillie Gifford..BairdBalterBarings FundsBaron Capital GroupBarrettBarrow FundsBaywoodBBHBeck, Mack & OliverBeckerBeech HillBeeHiveBerkshireBernzott Capital..BFSBiondo Investment..Bishop StreetBlackRockBlackstoneBlue Chip Investor..Blue Current FundsBMO FundsBNY Mellon FundsBogleBoston CommonBoston PartnersBoston Trust & Walden..Boyar Value FundBoyd Wattersonbp capitalBramshill..BrandesBretton FundBridge BuilderBridgesBridgewayBright RockBroadview FundsBrookfield Investment..Brown Advisory..Brown Capital..BruceBTSBuffaloBullfinchCalamosCaldwell & OrkinCalvert InvestmentsCambiar FundsCamelot FundsCampbell & CompanyCane Capital..Canterbury Investment..Capital AdvisorsCapital GroupCapital Guardian Trust..Capital ManagementCardinal CapitalCastle Investment..CastlemaineCatalyst Mutual..CausewayCavalierCavanal Hill fundsCBOE VestCCA FundsCedar RidgeCenterstone..Centre FundsCentury FundsCG fundsCGMChaconia FundsChadwick & D'AmatoChamplain FundsChanging Parameters,..Chartwell Investment..ChaseChesapeakeChilton FundsChiron Investment..Chou AmericaChristopher Weil &..Cincinnati Asset..City National..Clark Fork TrustClarkston FundsClifford CapitalClipper FundCloughCM AdvisorsCMGCogniosCognios CapitalCohen & SteersCohoCollinsColumbiaCommerceCommonwealth Intl..Community Capital..Community Development..ConcordeConductorConestoga Capital..CongressContext Asset..ConvergenceCook & Bynum Capital..Copeland Capital..CopleyCornerCapCornerstoneCortina Funds IncCounterpoint Mutual..Cove Street CapitalCovered BridgeCozadCrawfordCredit Suisse (New..CRMCroftCrow PointCullen Funds TrustCutlerCVRDana InvestmentDavenportDavidson Mutual..Davis FundsDay HaganDDJDean FundDearborn Partners..Deer ParkDestinations FundsDestraDeutsche Asset..DF Dent FundsDGHMDGIDiamond Hill FundsDimensional Fund..Direxion FundsDodge & CoxDominiDoubleLineDreyfusDriehausDUNDASDunham FundsDuPontDupreeE-Valuator fundsEagle FundsEASEaton VanceEdgar LomaxEdgewoodEIP FundsElessar Investment..EmeraldEmpiric FundsEnsemble FundEntrepreneurShares..Epiphany FundsEquinox Funds TrustEquity Investment..EquityCompassEstabrookEuro Pacific Asset..Eventide FundsEvermoreExceed InvestmentsFairholmeFAMFCI FundsFDP Series FundsFederatedFidelity..Fiera CapitalFirst EagleFirst InvestorsFirst Security FundFirst StateFirst TrustFirst Trust Portfolios..First Western Capital..Firsthand FundsFisher InvestmentsFlippin, Bruce &..FMC FundsFMI FundsFootprintsForesterFormulaFoliosFort Pitt Capital..FoundryFPAFrank FundsFranklin Templeton..Freedom FundsFrontier FundsFrost FundsFulcrumFuller & ThalerFund XFX Strategy FundGabelliGatorGaveKalGE Asset ManagementGeneva AdvisorsGerstein FisherGinkgoGiralda FundGlenmedeGlobal View CapitalGMOGoehring &..Goldman SachsGolubGood HarborGoodHavenGothamGQG PartnersGrandeur Peak FundsGranite HarborGranite Investment..Grant ParkGreat Lakes FundsGreat-West FundsGreen CenturyGreen OwlGreenspringGuggenheim..GuideMarkGuidePathGuideStone FundsGuinness AtkinsonGurtinHamlin Capital..Hancock HorizonHanlonHarborHarding LoevnerHartford Mutual..Harvest FundsHatteras FundsHaverfordHaysHeartlandHedeker WealthHedgeRowHenderson GlobalHennessyHenssler FundsHighland FundsHighmoreHillman Capital..HodgesHolbrook HoldingsHolland Series..HomesteadHorizon InvestmentsHotchkis & WileyHoward Capital..HSBCHuber FundsHundredfoldHussman FundsHVIA Equity FundICM Series TrustICON FundsIMSIndependent Franchise..Index FundsIndexIQInfinity QInnealta CapitalInnovator FundsInsight InvestmentInsignia MacroIntegrityIntrepid FundsInvescoInvesco Capital Markets..Investment House..Investment Managers..Iron FundsIronBridge Funds,..Ironclad FundsIssachar FundIVA FundsIvy FundsJackson SquareJacobJAG Capital Management,..James AdvantageJanus HendersonJensenJOHCM FundsJohn HancockJohnson Mutual..JPMorganKaizenKCMKeeleyKellnerKempnerKineticsKirr Marbach..KKMKnights Of ColumbusKopernikKP FundsLadder Capital CorpLadenburg ThalmannLateef Investment..Laudus FundsLawson Kroeker..LazardLEADERLeavellLee Financial Group..Legg MasonLeland FundsLeutholdLiberty StreetLinde HansenLitman Gregory Masters..LJM FundsLKCMLM CapitalLMCG FundsLoCorr FundsLogan CapitalLogan Circle..Long ShortLongboardLongleaf PartnersLoomis Sayles FundsLord AbbettLSV FundLyricalMacquarie Investment..Madison FundsMAIMain ManagementMainGate TrustMainStayMairs & PowerManaged Futures..Manning & NapierManor Investment..Marathon FundsMarketfield FundsMarketocracy FundsMarshfieldMarsico Investment..MassMutualMatrix Advisors Funds..Matrix/LMHMatthew 25Matthews Asia FundsMcKee FundsMD SassMeasured Risk..Meeder FundsMeehan FocusMeridianMeritage Portfolio..Merk FundsMetropolitan West..MFSMH EliteMidasMiles CapitalMiller InvestmentMiller Value FundsMiller/Howard Funds..Mirae Asset Global..MOERUS FUNDSMoncapfundMondrianMonettaMonteagle FundsMorgan DempseyMorgan StanleyMotley FoolMP 63MT LucasMuhlenkampMundoval FundsMutual of AmericaMutualhedgeMuzinichNationwideNatixis FundsNavigator FundsNeedhamNeiman FundsNeuberger BermanNew AlternativesNew Century..New CovenantNewfoundNicholasNile Capital Investment..North Country FundsNorth StarNorthCoastNortheast InvestorsNorthern FundsNorthPointe FundsNorthquest Capital..NorthwoodNottinghamNuance InvestmentsNuveenNWM MomentumNysaO'Shaughnessy Mutual..Oâ€™Shaughnessy Asset..Oak AssociatesOak Ridge FundsOakhurstOakmarkOaktree FundsOberweisOCMOld WestburyOlsteinOppenheimerFundsOrchard Capital..Orinda FundsOsterweisOtter CreekPacific Advisors..Pacific CapitalPacific FinancialPacific Funds Series..Palmer SquarePappParadigm FundsParnassusPatriotPax WorldPaydenfundsPayson FundsPear Tree FundsPenn Capital..PerkinsPermanent PortfolioPerrittPersimmon Capital..PhocasPIA Mutual FundsPiedmontPimcoPineBridgePinnaclePinnacle Capital..Pioneer InvestmentsPlan Investment..PMC FundsPNC FundsPolaris FundsPolen CapitalPoplar Forest..Port Street..Portfolio..Potkul FundsPower Dividend Index..Power Income FundPower Momentum Index..Praxis Mutual FundsPreserver FundsPrice Asset..Primary TrendPRIMECAP Odyssey..PrincetonPrincipal FundsPrivate Capital..Probabilities FundProFundsProspector FundsProvidentPrudential Funds (PGIM..PSG FundsPutnamPzenaQuakerQueens Road FundsRainierRanger FundsRareview CapitalRational FundsRBB FundsRBC Global Asset..Reaves Select..RedmontRedwoodRegalReinhartfundsREMSGroupRenaissance CapitalRESQ FundsReynoldsRice Hall JamesRidgeWorthRiver CanyonRiverbridgeRiverNorth FundsRiverPark FundsRMB FundsRNC Genter Capital..Rockefeller & Co.RooseveltRoxbury FundsRoyceRQSIRSQRussellRVXRWCRyan LabsRydex FundsSA FundsSalient FundsSands CapitalSaratogaSarofimSATUIT FUNDSSaturna CapitalSaturna Sustainable..Savos Investments..Scharf InvestmentsSchneider FundsSchroderSchwab FundsSchwartzScotiaFundsScoutSeafarer FundsSegall Bryant &..SEISelected FundsSelectiveSemperSentinelSequoiaSextant Mutual..Shelton Capital..Shenkman FundsSierra TrustSilverPepperSirius FundsSitSkyBridgeSmead FundsSmith GroupSnow Capital FundsSound MindSound ShoreSoundwatch CapitalSparrowSpirit of AmericaSpouting RockSTAAR Investment..Stadion FundsState FarmState Street Global..State Street Global..Steben & CompanySteinbergSterling Capital..Steward FundsStone HarborStralem FundSummit Global..SuperfundSwanSymonsT. Rowe PriceTanakaTarget ProgramTaylor Frigon Capital..TCM FundsTCWTD Asset ManagementTebergTeton Westwood..TFS Capital FundsThird AvenueThomas White FundsThompson IM Funds..Thomson Horstmann &..ThornburgThriventTIAA InvestmentsTilson FundsTimothy PlanTOBAM Core..TocquevilleToews FundsTopturnToreadorTorrayTorray ResoluteTortoise Capital..Tortoise Credit..TouchstoneTowle & CoTransamericaTransWestern FundsTributary FundsTrillium Mutual..Trust for Credit..Trust for Professional..TS&W FundsTurner FundsTweedy, BrowneTwo Oaks Investment..U.S. Global..UBS Asset..Upright Investments..USA MutualsUSAAUSCAVALICValue LineVan EckVan Hulzen Asset..VanguardVericimetry FundsVictoryVikingVillereVirtusVivaldiVolumetricVontobelVoyaVulcan Value..Waddell & ReedWakefield FundsWall StreetWalthausen FundsWasatchWasmer SchroederWavelength FundsWaycrossWBI FUNDSWCM Investment..WeissWeitzWellington ShieldsWells Fargo FundsWentworth, Hauser and..WesMarkWest ShoreWestchester CapitalWestcoreWestfield CapitalWestwoodWilbanks Smith &..William BlairWilliamsburg Investment..Wilmington FundsWilshire Mutual..Wintergreen FundsWirelessWisconsin Capital..WOAWorld FundsWorld Funds TrustWorld Funds, IncWP TrustWrightYCG FUNDSYorktown FundsZacks FundsZeoZevenbergen Capital..ZieglerView FundsMorningstar CommentaryThe 4 Smallest Medalists 07/25/2017The Sector-Neutral Value ETF 07/21/2017Good Bets for a Rebound 07/18/2017

Investment Returns, Risks and ComplexitiesCarefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses before investing. A prospectus, obtained by calling 800-669-3900 or by clicking on the prospectus link, contains this and other important information about an investment company. Read carefully before investing.*The Premier List represents what Morningstar Investment Management believes to be the “top picks” funds in each category from the universe of no-load funds with minimums less than $10,000 and open to new investors available on TD Ameritrade’s platform.A mutual fund is not FDIC-insured, may lose value, and is not guaranteed by a bank or other financial institution. Performance quoted represents past performance, is no guarantee of future results, and may not provide an adequate basis for evaluating the performance of the product over varying market conditions or economic cycles. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data quoted. The investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate so that an investor's shares, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original cost.TD Ameritrade receives remuneration from mutual fund companies, including those participating in its no-load, no-transaction-fee program, for recordkeeping, shareholder services, and other administrative and distribution services. The amount of TD Ameritrade's remuneration for these services is based in part on the amount of investments in such funds by TD Ameritrade clients. PLEASE ALSO SEE IMPORTANT ADDITIONAL FUND FEE DISCLOSURE INFORMATIONNo-transaction-fee funds and other funds offered through TD Ameritrade have other fees and expenses that apply to a continued investment in the fund and are described in the prospectus.Mutual funds, closed-end funds and exchange-traded funds are subject to market, exchange rate, political, credit, interest rate, and prepayment risks, which vary depending on the type of fund.  International investments involve special risks, including currency fluctuations and political and economic instability. Asset allocation and diversification do not eliminate the risk of experiencing investment losses.  Fund purchases may be subject to investment minimums, eligibility and other restrictions, as well as charges and expenses.Although certain money market funds seek to preserve their value of your investment at $1 per share, it is possible to lose money by investing in such a fund.  Certain money market funds may impose liquidity fees and redemption gates in certain circumstances.Some mutual funds sold through TD Ameritrade impose a charge on the purchase of shares, called a “sales load.” An investor may be able to purchase fund shares through TD Ameritrade without paying a front-end sales load, but an investor  may be charged a fee, called a “contingent deferred sales charge,” when the investor sells or redeems shares.  TD Ameritrade may receive part or all of the sales load.Some mutual funds offer reductions in front-end sales loads (“breakpoints”) for purchases over certain amounts or purchases through Letters of Intent or Rights of Accumulation.  Some funds also offer waivers of those loads, often to retirement plans or charities.  Such breakpoints or waivers will be as further described in the prospectus. You, as the investor, should determine and obtain any breakpoints or waivers or provide TD Ameritrade with sufficient information to assist it in obtaining them.Most mutual funds charge 2.00% on the redemption of shares (including by exchange) held for less than a certain number of calendar days.  Performance figures reported do not reflect the deduction of this fee. If reflected, the fee would reduce the performance quoted. Please refer to the fund's prospectus for redemption fee information. TD Ameritrade may also charge its own short-term redemption fee.See the SEC Guide to Mutual Funds for more information.TD AMERITRADE RISKS OF INVESTING IN FUNDS: PLEASE READ IMPORTANT ADDITIONAL MUTUAL FUND, EXCHANGE-TRADED FUND, AND CLOSED-END FUND RISK DISCLOSURESResearch and planning tools are obtained by unaffiliated third-party sources deemed reliable by TD Ameritrade. However, TD Ameritrade does not guarantee their accuracy and completeness and makes no warranties with respect to results to be obtained from their use. The Investment Profile report is for informational purposes only.The Morningstar Rating™ for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.Morningstar Investment Management LLC is a registered investment adviser and subsidiary of Morningstar, Inc. The universe of mutual funds made available on TD Ameritrade’s platform does not include all mutual funds available in the marketplace. Both the universe of mutual funds defined by TD Ameritrade and the Premier List selected by Morningstar Investment Management are subject to change at any time without notice. Particular mutual funds on the Premier List may not be appropriate investments for you under your circumstances, and there may be other mutual funds or other investment options offered by TD Ameritrade that are more suitable. Morningstar Investment Management may have more favorable opinions of certain mutual funds which are not included in the universe of mutual funds made available through TD Ameritrade. The Morningstar Investment Management selections were based on qualitative factors and quantitative analysis in addition to the judgment of Morningstar Investment Management analysts. Morningstar Investment Management does not warrant this information to be accurate, complete or timely. Morningstar Investment Management is not responsible for any damages or losses arising from the use of this information and is not acting in the capacity of adviser to individual investors. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.Neither Morningstar Investment Management nor Morningstar, Inc. is affiliated with TD Ameritrade or their affiliates. Morningstar, the Morningstar logo, Morningstar.com, and the Morningstar Tools are either trademarks or service marks of Morningstar, Inc.Certain funds, such as Rydex Dynamics Funds and Direxion, price twice a day if you trade them directly with the fund company. Trades placed with TD Ameritrade will be transacted once daily at the closing net asset value on the trade date and are subject to regular mutual fund settlement rules.For a more complete discussion of risk factors applicable to each currency product, carefully read the particular product's prospectus.Morningstar Investment Management, LLC is a registered investment advisor and wholly owned subsidiary of Morningstar, Inc. The mutual funds selected by Morningstar Investment Management for the Premier List have been derived from a universe of mutual funds made available through TD Ameritrade. Both the universe of mutual funds defined by TD Ameritrade and the Premier List are subject to change without notice. Particular mutual funds on the Premier List may not be appropriate investments for you under your circumstances, and there may be other mutual funds or investment options offered by TD Ameritrade that are more suitable. The information, data and opinions contained herein include proprietary information of Morningstar Investment Management and may not be copied or redistributed for any purpose. Morningstar Investment Management does not warrant this information to be accurate, complete or timely. Morningstar Investment Management is not responsible for any damages or losses arising from the use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. The Morningstar name and logo are registered marks of Morningstar, Inc. Morningstar Investment Management is not affiliated with TD Ameritrade.Copyright ©2017. All rights reserved.3rd Party Research Disclosure /public-6:1:52Market Data Disclosure












  
 




 





Product/Fund Performance & Regulatory Documents - MassMutual




















































MassMutual
Log In
Logout

























 



Product/Fund Performance & Regulatory Documents
Get monthly/quarterly performance, fact sheets, summary prospectuses, prospectuses, and annual/semiannual reports.











Select product or fund type:






Select product or fund type:




Annuities (variable)





MassMutual Transitions Select (SM) II


MassMutual Capital Vantage®


MassMutual Transitions Select (SM) (no longer sold)


MassMutual Evolution (SM) (no longer sold)


MassMutual Artistry


MassMutual RetireEase Select (SM) (no longer sold)


MassMutual Equity Edge (SM) (no longer sold)


Panorama Passage® (no longer sold)


MassMutual Transitions® (no longer sold)


Panorama Premier (no longer sold)


Flex Extra (no longer sold)


Panorama® (no longer sold)


Panorama Plus (no longer sold)


LifeTrust (no longer sold)







Executive Benefits





MassMutual Electrum (SM) (SL18)


Strategic Group Variable Universal Life® II (SGVUL II)


Strategic Group Variable Universal Life® (SGVUL)


Strategic Variable Life® Plus (SL10)


Strategic Variable Life® (SL9)


Large Case Variable Life Plus® (SL6)







Life Insurance (variable)





Variable Universal Life III (VUL III)


VUL Guard (SM)


Survivorship VUL Guard (SM)


Variable Universal Life II (VUL II)


Survivorship Variable Universal Life II (SVUL II)


Variable Universal Life (VUL)


Survivorship Variable Universal Life (SVUL)


Variable Life Select (VLS)


Variable Life Plus (VLP)


Variable Life (VLI)


The Blue Chip Company's Variable Universal Life (BCVUL)







MML Series Investment Fund*





MML Aggressive Allocation Fund


MML American Funds® Core Allocation Fund


MML American Funds® Growth Fund


MML American Funds® International Fund


MML Balanced Allocation Fund


MML Blue Chip Growth Fund


MML Conservative Allocation Fund


MML Equity Income Fund


MML Equity Index Fund


MML Focused Equity Fund


MML Foreign Fund


MML Fundamental Growth Fund


MML Fundamental Value Fund


MML Global Fund


MML Growth Allocation Fund


MML Growth & Income Fund (ClassI)


MML Income & Growth Fund


MML International Equity Fund


MML Large Cap Growth Fund


MML Managed Volatility Fund


MML Mid Cap Growth Fund


MML Mid Cap Value Fund


MML Moderate Allocation Fund


MML Small Cap Growth Equity Fund


MML Small Company Value Fund


MML Small/Mid Cap Value Fund


MML Total Return Bond







MML Series Investment Fund II*





MML Asset Momentum Fund


MML Blend Fund


MML Dynamic Bond Fund


MML Equity Fund


MML Equity Rotation Fund


MML High Yield Fund


MML Inflation-Protected and Income Fund


MML Managed Bond Fund


MML Short-Duration Bond Fund


MML Small Cap Equity Fund


MML Special Situations Fund


MML Strategic Emerging Markets Fund


MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund







MassMutual Premier Funds**





Premier Balanced Fund


Premier Core Bond Fund


Premier Disciplined Growth Fund


Premier Disciplined Value Fund


Premier Diversified Bond Fund


Premier Global Fund


Premier High Yield Fund


Premier Inflation-Protected and Income Fund


Premier International Equity Fund


Premier Main Street Fund


Premier Short Duration Bond Fund


Premier Small Cap Opportunities Fund


Premier Strategic Emerging Markets Fund


Premier U.S. Government Money Market Fund


Premier Value Fund







MassMutual Select Funds**





MM MSCI EAFE® International Index Fund


MM RetireSMART 2010 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2015 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2020 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2025 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2030 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2035 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2040 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2045 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2050 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2055 Fund


MM RetireSMART 2060 Fund


MM RetireSMART Conservative Fund


MM RetireSMART Growth Fund


MM RetireSMART In Retirement Fund


MM RetireSMART Moderate Fund


MM RetireSMART Moderate Growth Fund


MM Russell 2000® Small Cap Index Fund


MM S&P® 500 Index Fund


MM S&P® Mid Cap Index Fund


Select Blackrock Global Allocation Fund


Select Blue Chip Growth Fund


Select Diversified Value Fund


Select Equity Opportunities Fund


Select Fundamental Growth Fund


Select Fundamental Value Fund


Select Growth Opportunities Fund


Select Large Cap Value Fund


Select Mid Cap Growth Fund


Select Mid Cap Value Fund


Select Overseas Fund


Select Small Cap Growth Equity Fund


Select Small Cap Value Equity Fund


Select Small Company Growth Fund


Select Small Company Value Fund


Select Strategic Bond Fund


Select Total Return Bond Fund







MassMutual IRA 














View information on our Electronic Delivery Program



Looking for retirement plan (i.e., 401k) performance? Log in to RetireSmartSM 






Related Information



Holdings within funds in MML Series Investment Fund and MML Series Investment Fund II (PDF)


Holdings for the MassMutual Premier Funds and MassMutual Select Funds (PDF)


Proxy voting record for holdings within funds in MML Series Investment Fund and MML Series Investment Fund II


Proxy voting record for the MassMutual Premier Funds and MassMutual Select Funds


MassMutual Select Funds Information Statement (PDF)


Portfolio Holdings Disclosures for the MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund (PDF)


Portfolio Holdings Disclosures for the MassMutual Premier U.S. Government Money Market Fund (PDF)


Statistical Information for the MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund


Statistical Information for the MassMutual Premier U.S. Government Money Market Fund


Provision of Financial Support to MML U.S. Government Money Market Fund (PDF)


Information regarding reduced sales charges for Class A shares of the MassMutual Premier Funds and MassMutual Select Funds (PDF)


Compensation Arrangements









Please call 1-888-309-3539 or email fundinfo@massmutual.com to report problems accessing the underlying fund summary prospectuses, prospectuses, and annual/semiannual reports (“disclosure documents”), problems with saving or printing these online disclosure documents, and/or any other technological issues that may arise related to viewing the online fund disclosure documents.
* These funds are underlying funds of MassMutual's variable life and variable annuity products and are not available for retail sale.
** These funds are only available for sale to retirement plans and other eligible institutional investors. They are not available for retail sale. To obtain the most recent quarterly Due Diligence Report or other information available for any of the MassMutual Premier and MassMutual Select Funds, please contact RS Investment Performance and Reporting.
Sales of all variable annuity and variable life insurance products must be preceded or accompanied by the current prospectuses for the products and their investment choices, which contain more information on charges, expenses, risks, and investment objectives. Please read them carefully before you invest or send money. These prospectuses are available through the above links. Contact your registered representative if you have any questions.
Insurance products issued by Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company (MassMutual) (Springfield, MA 01111-0001) and its subsidiaries, C.M. Life Insurance Company and MML Bay State Life Insurance Company (Enfield, CT 06082).
Principal Underwriters: MML Distributors, LLC (MMLD) and MML Investors Services, LLC (MMLIS), Members SIPC® (www.SIPC.org), and MML Strategic Distributors, LLC (MSD). MMLD, MMLIS and MSD, all Members FINRA (www.FINRA.org), are subsidiaries of Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company, Springfield, MA 01111-0001.











Close











 



Sammons Retirement Solutions


























































Sign in or enter your access code





















1
2
3

























Web Content Display

Web Content Display















Are You A Financial Professional?



LiveWell® Retirement Series At-A-Glance
                                      



                                            Run an Illustration
                                      



                                            Access Forms & Materials
                                      



                                            Log In To Your Book of Business
                                      




Are You An Individual Investor?



LiveWell® Retirement Series At-A-Glance
                                      



                                            Why Sammons Retirement Solutions® Inc?
                                      



                                            Log In To Your Account
                                      




















Web Content Display

Web Content Display














The LiveWell® Mutual Fund IRA Series and LiveWell® Variable Annuity feature some of the country's premier money managers:





















































Web Content Display

Web Content Display












Investing in mutual funds and variable annuities involves risk, including the potential loss of investment. You should consider the investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses of the mutual fund or variable annuity and its underlying investment options carefully before investing. The prospectus and/or summary prospectus contain this and other information. You may contact your financial professional or call 866-747-3421 to obtain a current prospectus for the mutual fund or the variable annuity and its underlying investment options. Please read it carefully.
Securities distributed by Sammons Financial Network® LLC, member FINRA. Insurance products are issued by Midland National® Life Insurance Company (West Des Moines, IA). Sammons Retirement Solutions® Inc. provides administrative services. Sammons Financial Network® LLC, Midland National® Life Insurance Company, and Sammons Retirement Solutions are affiliated companies and indirect wholly owned subsidiaries of Sammons Enterprises, Inc. of Dallas, Texas.
Guggenheim Investments is the fund manager for the investment management business of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim"). Guggenheim is an affiliate of Sammons Enterprises, Inc., the parent company of Sammons® Financial Group, Inc. and its affiliated companies.
Please click the links below to view important product-specific disclosures:
LiveWell® Mutual Fund IRA | LiveWell® Plus Mutual Fund IRA | LiveWell® Variable Annuity | LiveWell® Preferred Fixed Index Annuity | LiveWell® Fixed Index Annuity | LiveWell® Guarantee Annuity
NOT FDIC/NCUA INSURED, MAY LOSE VALUE, NO BANK/CU GUARANTEE, NOT A DEPOSIT, NOT INSURED BY ANY FEDERAL AGENCY









































AngelList - Where the world meets startups
































































Join
 
Log In







AngelList


Startup Jobs

Recruit

Invest

More





Companies

Freelancers

Incubators

Track

Salaries
Valuations

Help











Your Alumni Network








Companies

Freelancers

Incubators

Track

Salaries
Valuations

Help


















 



Where the world meets startups


 
Find a Startup Job

Post a Job

Invest in Startups



 













Get a Job at a Startup


Apply privately to 67,742 startup jobs with one application

No middlemen
·
See salary and equity upfront



Find a Job
Post a Job







Warby Parker







Shyp









Facebook







Stripe









Medium







Tinder












Join the Professional Investor Program


Full name



Email



Phone number



Location



Type of entity

Single Family Office
Multi-Family Office
Venture Investor
Institution
Financial Advisor
Other

Name of your firm or fund



Your role



Annual budget for startup investing



Personal Message















Invest in Startups


Build a diverse portfolio of early-stage startup investments

Private and oversubscribed deals






Deal-by-deal Investments


Invest alongside notable lead investors to access top deals


Learn More »






Invest in a Startup Fund


One investment gets you exposure to 100+ startups


View Details »






Professional Investors


For family offices, institutions and financial professionals


Request Access »





RECENT EXITS







Cruise Automation


ACQUIRED BY
GENERAL MOTORS









Ticketbis


ACQUIRED BY
EBAY












Browse jobs by role

Data Scientist jobs
Designer jobs
Developer jobs
Frontend Developer jobs
Hardware Engineer jobs


Human Resources jobs
Marketing jobs
Mobile Developer jobs
Product Manager jobs
Sales jobs





Browse jobs by location

Austin jobs
Boston jobs
Chicago jobs
Colorado jobs
India jobs


London jobs
Los Angeles jobs
New York jobs
Seattle jobs
Silicon Valley jobs










Founded by AngelList Alumni





Now anyone can invest in startups through the
Republic equity crowdfunding platform




View crowdfunding companies












Help
·
Directory
·
Blog
Twitter
·
Terms & Risks
·
Unsubscribe

·
Mobile



·
Desktop


·
Photo Credit










Annuity Prospectuses and Supplements














Skip to Main Content





Prudential Home
Customer Support



Search











Select Options



 
Log in to Your Account
Insurance, Mutual Funds & Annuities
401(k) / 403(b) / 457 / Pensions
Pruco COMMAND or Investor
Alliance Account

All Login Options




OUR COMPANY
PRODUCTS & SERVICES

RESEARCH & PERSPECTIVES
INVESTOR RELATIONS
CORPORATE RESPONSIBILITY
NEWSROOM
CAREERS











			SOLUTIONS FOR INDIVIDUALS
		

			SOLUTIONS FOR BUSINESSES & ORGANIZATIONS
		





Insurance

Life Insurance
Annuities



Investments

Mutual Funds
Brokerage Accounts
Strategic Investment Research Group



Retirement

Retirement Solutions
The Retirement Red Zone
Retirement Accounts



Planning Guides

Women & Money
African American Financial Experience
Retirement Planning

All Guides, Tutorials & Calculators






Benefits & Services

Retirement Services
Group Insurance



Institutional Investments
            & Products

Institutional Investments
Private Placements
Guaranteed Investments
Financial Institution Products



Retirement

Defined Contribution
Defined Benefit
Guaranteed Retirement Income
Pension Risk Strategies



Commercial Property

Commercial Mortgages
Real Estate Investing



Research & Perspectives

Retirement Reports
Institutional Investments Reports
Group Benefits Reports
Annuities, Life Insurance & Mutual Funds Reports





 







            Annuity Prospectuses and Supplements
          
Insurance / Annuities / Annuity Prospectuses and Supplements






Prospectuses



Current Product Prospectuses
Advanced Series Trust Prospectuses
Discontinued Product Prospectuses
Subaccount Prospectuses
Information and Proxy Statements
Statements of Additional Information and Reports
Policies and Disclosures

Call your Financial Professional for more information about our products.


 Current Product Prospectuses


Prudential Premier Retirement B Series and C Series
Prospectus eff. 02/10/2014 1 

NY Prospectus eff. 02/10/2014 1   


Prudential Defined Income Variable Annuity
Prospectus

Prospectus w/CA Supplement

NY Prospectus


Prudential Premier Investment B and C Series
Prospectus

NY Prospectus

Back to Top
Note: Not all products may be available in all states or firms.
 

 Advanced Series Trust Prospectuses


Advanced Series Trust (ASTTM) A (1 of 2)
Opens the document in a new windowFull Prospectus


Advanced Series Trust (ASTTM) B (2 of 2)
Opens the document in a new windowFull Prospectus


AST TM AB Global Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Academic Strategies Asset Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Advanced Strategies Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM AQR Emerging Markets Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM AQR Large-Cap Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Balanced Asset Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM BlackRock Global Strategies Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM BlackRock/Loomis Sayles Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM BlackRock Low Duration Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM BlackRock Multi-Asset Income Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2017
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2018
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2019
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2020
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2021
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2022
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2023
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2024
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2025
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2026
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2027
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Bond Portfolio 2028
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Capital Growth Asset Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM ClearBridge Dividend Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Cohen & Steers Realty Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Columbia Adaptive Risk Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Emerging Managers Diversified Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM FI Pyramis® Quantitative Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM FQ Absolute Return Currency Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Franklin Templeton K2 Global Absolute Return Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Global Real Estate Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Goldman Sachs Global Growth Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Goldman Sachs Global Income Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Goldman Sachs Large-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Goldman Sachs Mid-Cap Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Goldman Sachs Multi-Asset Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Goldman Sachs Small-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Goldman Sachs Strategic Income Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Government Money Market Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM High Yield Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Hotchkis & Wiley Large-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM International Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM International Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Investment Grade Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM J.P. Morgan Global Thematic Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM J.P. Morgan International Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM J.P. Morgan Strategic Opportunities Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Jennison Global Infrastructure Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Jennison Large-Cap Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Legg Mason Diversified Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Loomis Sayles Large-Cap Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Lord Abbett Core Fixed Income Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Managed Alternatives Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Managed Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Managed Fixed Income Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM MFS Global Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM MFS Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM MFS Large-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Morgan Stanley Multi-Asset Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Multi-Sector Fixed Income Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Neuberger Berman Long/Short Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Neuberger Berman / LSV Mid-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM New Discovery Asset Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Parametric Emerging Markets Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Preservation Asset Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Prudential Core Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Prudential Flexible Multi-Strategy Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Prudential Growth Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM QMA International Core Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM QMA Large-Cap Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM QMA US Equity Alpha Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Quantitative Modeling Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM RCM World Trends Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Small-Cap Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Small-Cap Growth Opportunities Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Small-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM T. Rowe Price Asset Allocation Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM T. Rowe Price Diversified Real Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM T. Rowe Price Growth Opportunities Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM T. Rowe Price Large-Cap Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM T. Rowe Price Large-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM T. Rowe Price Natural Resources Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Templeton Global Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM WEDGE Capital Mid-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Wellington Management Global Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Wellington Management Hedged Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Wellington Management Real Total Return Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Western Asset Core Plus Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


AST TM Western Asset Emerging Markets Debt Portfolio
Summary Prospectus

Back to Top
Pyramis is a registered service mark of FMR LLC. Used with permission.
 

 Discontinued Product Prospectuses


Discovery Choice
Prospectus


Discovery Choice - NY
Prospectus


Discovery Life Plus
Prospectus


Discovery Life Plus - NY
Prospectus


Discovery Plus
Prospectus


Discovery Preferred
Prospectus


Discovery Select
Prospectus


Discovery Select - NY
Prospectus


Premier Bb Series
Prospectus


Premier B Series, L Series, X Series
Prospectus


Premier B Series, L Series, X Series - NY
Prospectus


Pruco Discovery Plus
N/A


Pruco Discovery Plus - NY
N/A


Prudential Premier Retirement L Series
Prospectus eff. 02/10/2014 1 

NY Prospectus eff. 02/10/2014 1   


Prudential Premier Retirement B Series, L Series, C Series
Prospectus eff. 02/25/2013  2 

Prospectus eff. 03/12/2010


Prudential Premier Retirement B Series, L Series, C Series - NY
Prospectus eff. 02/25/2013  2 

Prospectus eff. 03/12/2010  3 


Prudential Premier Retirement X Series
Prospectus


Prudential Premier Retirement X Series - NY
Prospectus


Qualified Variable Investment Plan
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Advisor
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Advisor - NY
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Annuity One
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Annuity One - NY
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Annuity One 3
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Annuity One 3 - NY
Prospectus


Strategic Partners FlexElite/FlexElite2
Prospectus


Strategic Partners FlexElite - NY
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Horizon
Prospectus

NY Prospectus


Strategic Partners Select
Prospectus


Strategic Partners Select - NY
Prospectus


Variable Investment Plan
Prospectus

Back to Top
 

 Subaccount Prospectuses


AB VPS Large Cap Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


American Century VP Value
Summary Prospectus


BlackRock Global Allocation V.I. Fund - Share Class III
Full Prospectus


Davis Value Fund
Summary Prospectus


Franklin Small-Mid Cap Growth VIP Fund - Class 2
Summary Prospectus


Invesco V.I. Core Equity Fund
Summary Prospectus


Janus Henderson Research Portfolio - Service Shares
Summary Prospectus


Janus Henderson Overseas Portfolio - Institutional Shares
Summary Prospectus


JPMorgan Insurance Trust Income Builder Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


MFS Growth Series
Summary Prospectus


MFS Research Series
Summary Prospectus


NVIT Emerging Markets Fund Class D
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Consumer Goods
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Consumer Services
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Financials
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Health Care
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Industrials
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Large-Cap Growth
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Large-Cap Value
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Mid-Cap Growth
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Mid-Cap Value
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Real Estate
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Small-Cap Growth
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Small-Cap Value
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Telecommunications
Summary Prospectus


ProFunds Utilities
Summary Prospectus


Prudential Series Fund
Full Prospectus


PSF Conservative Balanced Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Diversified Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Equity Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Flexible Managed Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Global Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Government Income Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Government Money Market Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF High Yield Bond Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Jennison Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Jennison 20/20 Focus Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Natural Resources Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Small Capitalization Stock Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF SP International Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF SP Prudential U.S. Emerging Growth Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF SP Small-Cap Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Stock Index Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


PSF Value Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


T. Rowe Price Equity Inc. Portfolio
Summary Prospectus


T. Rowe Price International Stock Portfolio
Summary Prospectus

Back to Top
 

 Information and Proxy Statements


AST TM Academic Strategies Asset Allocation Portfolio Information Statement

Back to Top
 

 Statements of Additional Information and Reports


Advanced Series Trust (AST TM ) - Statement of Additional Information A (1 of 2)


Advanced Series Trust (AST TM ) - Statement of Additional Information B (2 of 2)


Prudential Series Fund - Statement of Additional Information


Annual Reports and Quarterly Holdings


XBRL

Back to Top
 

 Policies and Disclosures


Important Privacy Information and Choices


Audit Committee Charter


Compliance Committee Charter


Governance Committee Charter


Trustees


Proxy Voting Results

Back to Top


1 Applicable to contracts with applications signed on or after 02/10/2014 (03/24/2014 in CA).
2 Applicable to contracts with applications signed on or after 02/25/2013 - 02/09/2014 (02/25/2013 - 03/23/2014 in CA).
3 Applicable to contracts with applications signed on or after 03/12/2010 - 02/24/2013.
Disclaimer
If the prospectus for your annuity product is not available on this website, please refer to the prospectus or letter that was mailed to you via U.S Postal Service on or about 05/01/2016. To obtain another copy, you may contact the Annuities Service Center at 1-888-778-2888 or email us at service@prudential.com.

A Statement of Additional Information has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission and is incorporated by reference.

The Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) maintains a Web site (http://www.sec.gov) that contains the Statement of Additional Information, material incorporated by reference, and other information regarding registrants that file with the Commission.

The Prospectus is not an offer to sell, or a solicitation of an offer to buy this product, nor shall it be offered or sold to any person in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation, purchase, or sale would be unlawful under the securities laws of such jurisdiction.

Annuity contracts contain exclusions, limitations, reductions of benefits and terms for keeping them in force. Your licensed financial professional can provide you with complete details.

Investors should consider the features of the contract and the underlying portfolios' investment objectives, policies, management, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. This and other important information is contained in the prospectus, which can be obtained on the prospectus page or from your financial professional. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.

Annuities are issued by The Prudential Insurance Company of America and Pruco Life Insurance Company (in New York, by Pruco Life Insurance Company of New Jersey), all located in Newark, NJ (main office). Variable annuities are distributed by Prudential Annuities Distributors, Inc., Shelton, CT. All are Prudential Financial companies and each is solely responsible for its own financial condition and contractual obligations. Prudential Annuities is a business of Prudential Financial, Inc.

This material is for informational or educational purposes only; it is not intended as investment advice and is not a recommendation about managing or investing your retirement savings. In providing this material, the issuing companies and distributor listed above are not acting as your fiduciary as defined by any applicable laws and regulations.

Issued on Contracts: P-OB/IND(5/14), P-OB/IND(5/14)-NY, P-OC/IND(5/14), P-OC/IND(5/14)-NY, P-B/IND(2/10), P-B/IND(2/10)NY, P-CR/IND(2/10), P-CR/IND(2/10)NY, P-L/IND(2/10), P-L/IND(2/10)NY, VFLX-99, VFL-85, RAC-89, RAC-93, VAC-89, VAC-93, VFM-95, VFM-96, BLX/CRT (3/06)-01, A-85, VA-85, P-BBND(2/13), rider P-RID-LI-DB(5/14), P-BBND(2/13)-NY, BLX/CRT (03/06)-01, BL/IND (3/06)-NY, X/IND(3/06)-NY, P-X/IND(2/10), P-X/IND(2/10)NY, QVIP-84, VFLX-99, VBON-2000, VDCA-2000, VFLX-2002-L, #MVA-2002, VFM-960, VBON-2000.  

0162435-00093-00 Ed. 06/2017


















For Individuals & Families
Life Insurance

Term Life Insurance
Survivorship Life Insurance
Universal Life Insurance
Variable Life Insurance
Life Insurance Quote

Retirement

Annuities
Variable Annuities

Investments

Mutual Funds
Managed Accounts
Brokerage Accounts

Financial Planning

Guides, Calculators & Tutorials
Women & Money
The African American Financial Experience
The LGBT Financial Experience 
The Hispanic American Financial Experience





For Businesses & Organizations
Group Insurance

Group Life Insurance
Group Disability Insurance & Services

Retirement Services

Defined Contribution
Defined Benefit
Pension Risk Transfer Strategies
Guaranteed Retirement Income

Institutional Investments

Fundamental Equity
Quantitative Equity
Private Fixed Income
Fixed Income

Commercial Property

Real Estate Investing
Commercial Mortgages

Financial Institution Products



Sales Partner & Financial Professional Login

About Prudential
Customer Support
Careers
Find a Financial Professional
Sourcing & Procurement Information for Vendors
Misuse of Prudential name in fraud schemes 


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Statement
Important Notice for Illinois Customers
NY - Domestic Violence Notice
Business Integrity
HIPAA
Site map












Warning: Misuse of Prudential name in fraud schemes. Read more

Securities products and services are offered through: Pruco Securities, LLC, and Prudential Investment Management Services, LLC, both members SIPC and located in Newark, NJ, or Prudential Annuities Distributors, Inc., located in Shelton, CT. All are Prudential Financial companies. Prudential, the Prudential logo, the Rock Symbol and Bring Your Challenges are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide. Site for U.S. persons only.

Prudential Financial, its affiliates, and their financial professionals do not render tax or legal advice. Please consult with your tax and legal advisors regarding your personal circumstances.

Prudential Financial, Inc. of the United States is not affiliated with Prudential plc. which is headquartered in the United Kingdom.

Pruco Life Insurance Company, an Arizona company - California COA # 3637. The Prudential Insurance Company of America - California COA # 1179. Prudential Retirement Insurance and Annuity Company - California COA # 08003












Securities and Insurance Products:
Not Insured by FDIC or any Federal Government Agency   |   May Lose Value   |   Not a Deposit of or Guaranteed by the Bank or any Bank Affiliate  

Template:
0183077-00018-00
© 2017 Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities.



 


























7 Popular Software Programs for Portfolio Managers | Investopedia

















































































 























Topics



What's New



Fed Expected to Leave Rates Unchanged; Balance Sheet in Focus




Twitter No Longer at 'Death's Door' as Earnings Report Approaches


Topics

News
Financial Advisors
Markets
Anxiety Index
Investing
Managing Wealth
ETFs
The Trump Economy
Retirement
Personal Finance
Trading
ETFs Made Simple
Tech
Life Stages
Small Business
Bitcoin





Reference



Dictionary
Term Of The Day

Tender Offer
An offer to purchase some or all of shareholders' shares in a corporation. The price ... 
Read More »



Broker Reviews




Find the best broker for your trading or investing needs
See Reviews



Latest Videos


Are Bezos & Musk's Rocketships Bad for Markets?


Guides

Stock Basics
Economics Basics
Options Basics


Exam Prep

Series 7 Exam
CFA Level 1
Series 65 Exam





Advisors




Advisor Insights
Our network of expert financial advisors field questions from our community.
Ask A Question



Join Advisor Insights
Are you a financial advisor? Showcase your expertise to 20+ million investors.
Join Now



Financial Advisors
Sophisticated content for financial advisors around investment strategies, industry trends, and advisor education.


Find an Advisor

Atlanta
Los Angeles
Boston
New York
Houston





Markets




Markets
The latest markets news, real time quotes, financials and more.



Watchlist
Track stocks and ETFs
Add New Watchlist





Simulator




Stock Simulator
Trade with a starting balance of $100,000 and zero risk!



FX Trader
Trade the Forex market risk free using our free Forex trading simulator.






NEW
                                Academy
                            




Investopedia Academy
Learn from the world's leader in financial education
Check out all courses


Featured Courses



Become a day trader
Start Learning



Excel for Finance
Start Learning



Latest Courses

Become a Day Trader
Excel for Finance
Coming soon: Fundamental Investing
Coming soon: Financial Modeling
All Courses






















Site Log In


Advisor Insights Log In



Newsletters























                7 Popular Software Programs for Portfolio Managers            


    By Dan Moskowitz | September 18, 2015 — 10:49 AM EDT    






Share















































Are your investments spread out in lots of places? Are your 401(k) plans, trading accounts, and savings accounts located at different institutions? If that’s the case, then you likely receive separate updates for each on the status of the accounts, which can get confusing. It can also be difficult to know exactly where you stand in regards to net worth. 
Some investors swear by portfolio management software to help solve this problem. In some cases, like for retail investors, dealing with this type of software is a simple process. Below we provide synopses of portfolio management software programs for retail investors as well as much more advanced portfolio management software programs for money managers. (For related reading, see: Which Robo-Advisor is Right for You?)
For Retail Investors
Quicken Premier 2015
Price: $149
This system is best suited for those working on a desktop computer. Key features for Quicken Premier 2015:
Multiple Portfolio Views: asset allocations, geographic regions, sectors, performance comparisons
Insights for improvement
Import transaction capability from banks and brokerage accounts
Cost basis tracking
Capital gains estimates
Performance vs. market
Mutual fund comparisons
Helps make buy/sell decisions
Mobile features include:
Check account balances
Track budget
Updates and alerts
Snap and store receipts
Owl Software’s Personal Portfolio Manager (for Windows XP through Windows 10)
Price: $69. Comes with a free 30-day trial. If you don’t like the program, you can uninstall prior to 30 days to avoid being charged.
Key Features:
Can track up to 999 portfolios
Retirement planning
Brokerage accounts
College funds
“What if” analysis
Capital gains/loss calculations
Technical analysis – stochastics, RSI, trend analysis, moving averages (For related reading, see: Tips for Keeping Your Financial Data Safe Online.)
Quant IX Software’s Investment Account Manager 2.0
Price: $79/year with technical support, or $109/year with data feed with Quote Media for fundamental and descriptive data for stocks, ETFs, and mutual funds.
This software is designed by professional money managers and has been used by investors since 1985. Most say it's the ultimate tool for easy consolidation. Its Portfolio Setup Wizard allows you to import your transaction history and balances within minutes.
You will also receive transaction accounting for:
Stock purchases
Stock sales
Dividends
Interest
DRIPs
Short sales
Fund Manager
Personal Version (new): $89
Pro Version (new): $295
Advisor Version (new): $1,395
This portfolio management software is best suited for retail investors, money managers, and active traders. It tracks all trading and provides a Portfolio Active Summary as well as a Portfolio Performance Summary. (For related reading, see: How Advisors Can Adjust to Robo-Advisors.)
The Portfolio Active Summary includes:
Beginning market value
Contributions
Withdrawals
Withdrawal distributions
Account fees paid
Gain/loss
Ending market value
In addition to an Index Performance Summary, the Portfolio Performance Summary provides performance for the following time frames: Quarterly, year-to-date, one year, three years, five year, and ten year. 
Other key features include:
Importing capability
Updates and alerts
Graphing
Portfolio comparisons
Export capital gains information to tax software
Customizable reports
Multi-currency support
45 graph types
21 report types
For Professional Money Managers
softTarget's iBalance
Price: $8,000/month
This software might seem complicated at the start if you’re not experienced with portfolio management software in general. However, it won’t take long to adjust.
Features Offered:
Compliance management
Modeling
Scenario simulation
Portfolio rebalancing
Workflow automation
24/7 live support (For related reading, see: How to Evaluate a Robo-Advisor.)
Vestserve
Price: $27,500/year
Features Offered:
Compliance management
Modeling
Scenario simulation
Portfolio rebalancing
Workflow automation
24/7 live support
Benchmarking
Payroll/commission
Performance metrics
Portfolio management
Risk management
Rules-based modeling/compliance
Performance measurement – GIPS/IRR
Risk analytics
Breakout allocations and returns
Scenario tool
Yield curve analysis
“What if” analysis
Cash flow analysis
Complex fee calculations
Industry-Specific Ideas
FundCount's Portfolio
Price: Must Contact FC Portfolio
This software is best suited for hedge funds, fund administrators, and private equity funds. (For related reading, see: 10 Top Broker-Dealers to Follow on Social Media.)
Key Features:
Account management
Benchmarking
Client management
Equities
Fund management
Payroll/commission
Performance metrics
Risk management
Other Features Include:
GIPS-compliant presentation of performance reporting
Wide range of securities covered
Interfaces with brokers/custodians
Automated broker/custodians reconciliation
Client management and billing
Check writing
Workflow engine
Reports distribution engine
Integrated general ledger
eFront's FrontPM
Price: Must Contact eFront (free trial available)
This software is best suited for private equity firms that want to ensure consistency, automate key tasks, produce deeper analysis, and improve auditability. This software has been around since 1999 and is currently used by 700 companies. In addition to private equity firms, the software is used by real estate investment firms, banks, and insurance companies. Training is available via webinars, live online support, and in-person.
Key Features:
Benchmarking
Fund management
Risk management
The features list isn’t long, but this software is more geared toward quickly collecting and validating data and high-value analysis, which is expected to lead to better investment decisions. You can use eFront Front PM on-premise or via the cloud.
The Bottom Line
The best portfolio management software depends on your situation and goals. The right portfolio management software for someone else might not be the best solution for you. Be sure to study each option and gid a little deeper prior to making any purchases. Also strongly consider taking advantage of any available free trials.  (For more, see: How Technology Helps Financial Advisors.)









  






 












































      Trending
    



The Trump Economy: News and Analysis




Announcing the Top 100 Most Influential Financial Advisors




Who is Anthony Scaramucci?




Why Retiring on 70% of Your Income Might Be Tough




Investopedia's Guide to Impact Investing







Hot Definitions



                                                    Tender Offer                                            

 An offer to purchase some or all of shareholders' shares in a corporation. The price offered is usually at a premium to the ...  



                                                    Ponzi Scheme                                            

 A fraudulent investing scam promising high rates of return with little risk to investors. The Ponzi scheme generates returns ...  



                                                    Dow Jones Industrial Average - DJIA                                            

 The Dow Jones Industrial Average is a price-weighted average of 30 significant stocks traded on the New York Stock Exchange ...  



                                                    Revolving Credit                                            

 A line of credit where the customer pays a commitment fee and is then allowed to use the funds when they are needed. It is ...  



                                                    Marginal Utility                                            

 The additional satisfaction a consumer gains from consuming one more unit of a good or service. Marginal utility is an important ...  



                                                    Contango                                            

 A situation where the futures price of a commodity is above the expected future spot price. Contango refers to a situation ...  












Trading Center















Partner Links



















Want to learn how to invest?
Get a free 10 week email series that will teach you how to start investing.
Delivered twice a week, straight to your inbox.









No thanks, I prefer not making money.



























 

Dictionary:
#
a
b
c
d
e
f
g
h
i
j
k
l
m
n
o
p
q
r
s
t
u
v
w
x
y
z




Content Library
Articles
Terms
Videos
Guides
Slideshows
FAQs
Calculators
Chart Advisor
Stock Analysis
Stock Simulator
FXtrader
Exam Prep Quizzer
Net Worth Calculator




Connect With Investopedia
























Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers




Get Free Newsletters
Newsletters









Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers



© 2017, Investopedia, LLC.

All Rights Reserved
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy




























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









﻿



U.S. Trust Art Services


















1.800.U.S.TRUST
Have Us Contact You
Find an Office Near You
Client Login


GO
















Home
About Us
Our Capabilities
Our Latest Thinking
Account Access







U.S. Trust Art ServicesSolutions for Individuals and Institutions
Hear From Evan Beard





x



Key Art Services Capabilities

Art Lending–helps collectors unlock the capital of their collection
Art Planning–prepares collectors to establish a legacy for their collection
Nonprofit Services–assists institutions with investment and endowment management
Consignment Services–helps collectors arrange negotiation and distribution of works

 



At U.S. Trust, we offer our extensive art services. We provide solutions for collectors and institutions while helping to navigate the complex art world. For individuals, we lend against collections to unlock capital, design estate plan options specific to art, and help collectors prepare for a sale via consignment services. For institutions, we provide nonprofit advisory services, including institutional investment management by a fully outsourced Chief Investment Office. Our range of capabilities helps us deliver a broad combination of services to our clients.  In addition, we are proud to be a part of Bank of America’s commitment to the arts, which helps us make an important connection to the communities we serve. 
				To learn more, visit bankofamerica.com/arts.  Read More



Contact Us




Evan Beard
National Art Services Executive
646.855.1107
Email











 




Art Lending

Helps collectors unlock the capital of their collection




Art Lending
Leverage your collection to unlock capital.
Your art collection is a considerable financial asset that can lend flexibility to your overall wealth management strategy. Borrowing against the value of your art collection may help you access liquidity, raise capital, or reallocate and diversify your portfolio. Plus, what you might pay in interest on an art-related loan is generally less than the fees for an unsecured loan.


Key Art Lending Services

Can convert a static asset into one of economic value
Our third party appraisers ensure an objective appraisal
You maintain possession of pledged artwork
Dedicated team of credit specialists focus on art

 





x






video
Leveraging Your Art Collection
with Evan Reed







x






video
Art as a Source of Liquidity
with John Arena









pdf
Your Art Collection as Loan Collateral




 


TOP





Art Planning

Prepares collectors to establish a legacy for their collection




Art Planning
Plan for the future of your collection.
Art can create estate planning and legacy opportunities—as well as challenges—that are important to consider. We help you think of your collection as part of your legacy through trust, estate and philanthropic planning, with the goal of maximizing your—and your art’s—appreciation.


Key Art Planning Services

Establish your legacy through trust, estate, and philanthropic planning with our dedicated wealth strategists
Obtain guidance on managing your collection as part of your financial assets
Incorporate art and collectibles into your overall estate and financial plan according to your unique needs

 







pdf
Your Art Collection and Legacy Planning










article
Art in a New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as a part of an overall financial portfolio.
by Ian Prior



 


TOP





Nonprofit Services

Assists institutions with investment and endowment management




Nonprofit Services
Work with U.S. Trust to manage your organization’s investments or endowment.
Arts organizations and private and artist-endowed foundations which support the arts are often challenged with managing many aspects of their businesses, from investing philanthropic capital, to determining effective grantmaking strategies and other governance best practices. U.S. Trust delivers long-term, strategic planning and solutions to support arts institutions in carrying out their missions.


Key Nonprofit Services

Consultative services for governance, grants and donor strategies, and board relationships
Complete outsourced Chief Investment Office (OCIO) and endowment management services
Broad spectrum of lending and strategic planning solutions

 







article
Art in a New World
As public funding declines and competition for donations increases, arts organizations are increasingly expected to play by for-profit rules.
by Ian Prior









pdf
Considering and Selecting an OCIO




 


TOP





Consignment Services

Helps collectors arrange negotiation and distribution of works




Consignment Services
Arranging for the disposition of works and collections.
Whether a collector, heir, or institution prefers to sell one work or an entire collection, U.S. Trust can assist in arranging consignment agreements with auction houses, making our pre-negotiated terms available to you and streamlining the overall process.


Key Consignment Services

Our pre-negotiated terms can help maximize the value of your transaction
For very valuable collections, we will receive competitive bids from the auction houses and lead negotiations
We will help you consider seasonality and cyclical nature as well as trends in the art market before engaging in a consignment agreement

 






ninja











article
Art in a New World
Rising wealth, the globalization of markets and technological advances are transforming the art market
by Ian Prior



 


TOP







Contact us






Contact Us
Get in touch with our expert for all your art-related needs.
Evan BeardNational Art Services Executive
646.855.1107
Email



Share











TOP






Investment Management
Wealth Structuring
Credit & Banking
Working with U.S. Trust
Press Room








Connect with us:












Investment products: 
    					Are Not FDIC Insured
Are Not Bank Guaranteed
May Lose Value

Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.



Bank of America Home
Privacy & Security

Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC.  Equal Housing Lender
© 2017 Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.














U.S. Trust - Our Latest Thinking




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login

























Our Latest Thinking











Identifying the main drivers of long-term change is key to investment success in the 21st century. We believe we are at the beginning of a secular growth phase for the U.S. economy driven largely by the rebalancing of global growth from the developed to the developing world. We focus on the long-term drivers, the macro forces and investment themes at play across industries that are taking us into the next growth cycle.
Learn More






2017 Mid-Year ISO: The Tortoise and the Hare Cycle

Learn More









2017 U.S. Trust Insights on Wealth and Worth®
Our Survey results reveal common success traits that create a picture of modern day wealth in America.
Learn More









Reaping What We Compute
The Future of Technology in Agriculture
Learn More






Making It Your Mission
What values drive and inform your giving?
Learn More






Estate Administration in the Digital Era
Modern technology and antiquated statutes can present estate administrators with unexpected challenges.
Learn More






Highlights from the 2016 U.S. Trust® Study of HNW Philanthropy
Our study reveals a passion for philanthropy but also uncertainty about the impact.
Watch The Video






Capital Acumen Issue 32
 The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as part of an overall financial portfolio.
Learn More






Art in a New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as a part of an overall financial portfolio.
Learn More






The Growing Adoption of Wind Power
 The wind power industry is expected to deliver rapid job growth over the next decade.
Learn More






THE OWNER'S EMOTIONAL JOURNEY
 Lessons Learned Before, During and After the Sale of a Business 
Learn More






2017 Viewpoint: Shifting winds
Navigating Uncertainty with Specialty Assets
Learn More






Market Insights You Can Act On
Having the ability to have a pulse on what's going on around the world is absolutely critical.
Watch The Video









Alternative Energy: Powering a Brighter Future
Conventional sources are expected to continue to dominate the energy mix as the world moves toward a low-carbon economy
Learn More






Technology Is Disrupting Everything—Even Sneakers
CIO Chris Hyzy looks at game-changing innovation across industries and the often unexpected investment opportunities it's creating
Watch The Video






Sci-Fi M.D.: Moore's Law Meets the Hippocratic Oath
With technology generating futuristic advances, look for investment opportunities within healthcare — and beyond
Learn More






The Ripple Effect of Brexit
The repercussions of the UK's vote point to an uncertain future across the Eurozone and elsewhere.
Learn More






New Administration, New Realities for Investors
Optimism about the impact of President Trump's potentially pro-growth policies accelerates tectonic shifts in the markets.
Learn More






Five Investment Themes for 2017
Global equity markets are ending the year on a high note with solid gains for the fourth quarter so far in the U.S., Europe and Japan.
Learn More






PRESIDENT TRUMP: WHAT HIS TAX PROPOSALS COULD MEAN FOR YOU
Mitch Drossman discusses what tax-planning steps individuals and corporations should consider.
Watch The Video






The 2016 U.S. Trust® Study of High Net Worth Philanthropy 
Who's Giving to Which Causes and Why
Read More






Don't Fight the Fed
Despite unfavorable predictions from many economists, a stable dollar and the Federal Reserve's cautious stance seem to have staved off a global recession.
Read More






Investing in Iran: Roses or Thorns?
 In a nation newly open to foreign commerce, we find an abundance of investment opportunities — and caveats
Read More






In Conversation With Jane McGonigal
Shall we play a game? The author and video game designer talks time, gaming and the future.
Read More






IMPACT INVESTING: PEOPLE, THE PLANET AND PROFIT
As Impact Investing Comes Of Age, Investors Can Finally Seek a Better World and Return on Investment.
Learn More






Can China's Economy Bounce Back
DeAnne Steele on the depreciation of the yuan, the changing focus of the Chinese economy, and what it all means for investors.
Read More







Business Owners: You, Your Family, and Your Business
Working with a global financial services company helps enable you to address — and simplify — both your business and personal financial lives.

Learn More  







 KEEPING PENSION FUNDING GOALS IN SIGHT
This white paper investigates the use of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) in pension funding strategies.
Learn More 






Investing for Maximum Impact
Today's investors are using their portfolios to change the world-without losing return potential
Learn More




 



Addressing Memory and Your Family
There is no cure for cognitive decline, but we have a partial solution: being prepared for the unexpected.
Watch The Video






Rebuilding America: The Road Ahead
U.S. roads and highways, bridges and power grids, and other critical infrastructure have fallen into dangerous disrepair.
Learn More






Timberland as a Sustainable Investment
Timberland offers an opportunity to pursue both—an environmentally sensitive investment platform and financial advantages.
Learn More







Jackie VanderBrug, an investment strategist at U.S. Trust, highlights why women are growing into an economic superpower
Learn More







Women and Climate Change
Jackie VanderBrug, an investment strategist at U.S. Trust, describes how women may be especially vulnerable to the effects of climate change
Learn More






Direct Real Estate Investing
Commercial real estate offers the potential for attractive yields, capital appreciation and valuable tax benefits.
Learn More






A fixed income investment approach designed to optimize after-tax yield and after-tax total return
Learn More






Experiences shared and lessons learned from entrepreneurs who successfully sold or transferred their businesses to family members.
Learn More









Intelligent Outsourcing
This white paper examines when the outsourced chief investment officer (OCIO) arrangement may be appropriate for an organization.
Learn More






The Power of Positive Teaching
Educating children about the responsibilities of wealth can help keep them wealth-smart.
Learn More





Mitch Drossman, U.S. Trust's national director of wealth planning strategies, discusses the midterm election results, their possible legislative impact, and the implications from a tax-planning perspective.
Watch The Video












Specialty Asset Management
Our Specialty Asset Management team can work with your portfolio manager and wealth strategist to integrate these real assets into your overall plan and portfolio.
Learn More






Transitioning America's Farmland
It's clear that over the next decade or so, much of America's farmland — now held or farmed by an aging generation — will need to be transitioned.
Learn More






From Best Practices to Next Practices
In search of long-term and sustained philanthropic impact.
Learn More






Making Specialty Asset Gifts Work for Your Organization
Without the proper planning, accepting gifts of real assets today can lead to unexpected and potentially costly consequences. Are you prepared?
Learn More






Women and Girls Equality Strategy
By applying a gender lens, investors can align their portfolios with the goal of supporting gender equality while seeking a market rate of return.
Learn More






The more successful and established entrepreneurs become, the more likely they are to want a more formal mechanism for giving.
Learn More






Family Wealth Services
Our comprehensive, values-based approach to meeting the wealth management needs of our clients and their families.
Learn More






The ElderCare Planning Program
We are committed to addressing the wealth management needs of our clients and their aging families.
Learn More






Personalized Banking and Credit
Your banking and credit needs deserve the same level of expertise as your investments.
Learn More






Customized Aviation Financing
Developing a financing strategy for your aircraft.
Learn More






Financial Empowerment
Prepare your children for the important financial opportunities that lie ahead.
Learn More






Financing a special and unique asset.
Learn More



 






 







Filter By:





Capabilities


Show All
Investment Management
Wealth Structuring and Planning
Credit & Banking




Topics


Show All

Tax Planning
Trusts and Estates
Non-Financial Assets
Philanthropy










Back to Top




AR-ARTPRMPV-EXP-2018.02.7























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






BD78F429 (SCB*******802)



   







U.S. Trust - Investment Management




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login



























Investment Management
Insights, Strategies and Solutions
Our experienced professionals have expertise in a broad spectrum of traditional, alternative and non-financial assets.  We can work with you to develop and manage a portfolio tailored to your needs.






Portfolio Consulting
A collaborative dialogue with your portfolio manager
Your portfolio manager is a key member of your U.S. Trust relationship team and serves as your personal "chief investment officer." He or she will work with you to create an Investment Policy Statement, which serves as a blueprint for your portfolio by documenting your:

Objectives
Risk tolerance
Cash flow needs
 Tax situation
Wealth aspirations

Your portfolio manager's ongoing role is to incorporate our best strategic and tactical thinking, most relevant research analysis, current market insights and appropriate investment solutions into your portfolio. He or she will regularly monitor your portfolio to make sure it conforms to your Investment Policy Statement, which will be updated whenever there are significant changes in your life or goals.
Asset management
A more complete approach to asset allocation1
We analyze a wide range of asset classes, including hedge and private equity funds2 and global investment opportunities, as potential components of an asset allocation. In addition, we believe that true diversification requires managing for cash flows across and within asset classes in various market environments — not simply allocating according to a grid.
Your asset allocation will be based on the long-term expectations established for each asset class by our most senior investment professionals. Over the shorter term, however, your portfolio manager can adjust your portfolio tactically in response to emerging opportunities and risks, and reflecting U.S. Trust insights about trends and themes relevant to you.
How you own your assets — personally or in trusts; in taxable or tax-exempt solutions — can have a material impact on the overall performance of your portfolio. At U.S. Trust we focus on this wealth structuring aspect of your portfolio in conjunction with managing the assets themselves.
Alternative Investments
SOPHISTICATED SOLUTIONS TO MEET YOUR NEEDS2
Alternative investments at U.S. Trust focus on non-traditional assets such as:

Hedge funds
Private equity
Real estate and tangible assets

Because performance is often differentiated from equity and fixed income markets, alternative investments may be an ideal complement to traditional investments. 
Through our access to the industry's premier managers, we are able to offer solutions that provide options for all client segments. And we support you every step of the way with knowledge built on our experience in alternatives, including industry-leading research, rigorous due diligence, and cutting-edge portfolio construction.
Drawing from the experience, resources and expertise of the firm, you and your portfolio manager can explore alternative investments that can help you pursue what matters most to you.
Specialty asset management
Expertise in nonfinancial assets3
Specialty asset management at U.S. Trust focuses on nonfinancial assets such as:

Farm and ranch land
Timberland
Oil and gas properties
Private businesses
Real estate

Our Specialty Asset Management team can work with your portfolio manager and wealth strategist, as appropriate, to integrate these real assets into your overall plan and portfolio.
We can help you realize your objectives with assets you already own, or help you acquire specific assets to take advantage of their capital growth and diversification potential — whether you own these assets outright or they are held in trust.
Our team of specialists can provide complete turnkey services including identifying and purchasing real property and providing ongoing management.
Capital markets
Sophisticated market-linked solutions4
Through our access to the resources of Merrill Lynch, one of the world's leading capital markets participants, we can tailor approaches to risks and opportunities in the foreign exchange, interest rate, commodity and equity markets. Derivative-based transactions target the risks you seek to hedge, and are designed to dovetail with your overall portfolio and wealth management strategies.

1 Asset allocation and diversification do not ensure a profit or protect against loss in declining markets.
2 Alternative Investments such as derivatives, hedge funds, private equity funds, and funds of funds can result in higher return potential but also higher loss potential. Changes in economic conditions or other circumstances may adversely affect your investments. Before you invest in alternative investments, you should consider your overall financial situation, how much money you have to invest, your need for liquidity, and your tolerance for risk. Alternative investments are speculative and involve a high degree of risk.
3 Nonfinancial assets, such as closely-held businesses, real estate, oil, gas and mineral properties, and timber, farm and ranch land, are complex in nature and involve risks including total loss of value.  Special risk considerations include natural events (for example, earthquakes or fires), complex tax considerations, and lack of liquidity.  Nonfinancial assets are not suitable for all investors.  Always consult with your independent attorney, tax advisor, investment manager, and insurance agent for final recommendations and before changing or implementing any financial, tax, or estate planning strategy.
4 Brokerage services are provided by Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, a registered broker-dealer, Member SIPC and a wholly owned subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation.
Certain U.S. Trust associates are registered representatives with Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated ("MLPF&S") and may assist you with investment products and services provided through MLPF&S and other nonbank investment affiliates. MLPF&S is a registered broker-dealer, member SIPC and a wholly owned subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation ("BofA Corp."). U.S. Trust operates through Bank of America, N.A., and other subsidiaries of BofA Corp.
AR-ARY4G4DX-EXP-2017.06.17 






Videos:


Investment Management




Portfolio Construction



Fixed Income Solutions



Specialty Asset Manangement

View More Videos






You Might Also Be Interested In:

Wealth Structuring
Credit & Banking
Family Wealth Services
Specialty Asset Management
Institutional Investment Management
Philanthropy



Read Some of Our Latest Thinking

A Transforming World


Impact Investing




























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






BD78F429 (SCB*******802)




   








Capital Acumen Online


































ISSUE 32: 2017



Follow us on:





Click here to send us your comments







Home
Features


Arts Special


Art in a New World


Arts Calendar 2017


Investment Spotlight


Anchored by Discipline and Patience


Future Perspective


Technology Gives Healthcare an Adrenaline Shot


Your Business


Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan


Philanthropy


Getting Your Giving Right


Global Insights


The Ripple Effect of Brexit



Our Insights


President's Letter


A Message From Keith Banks


Macro Analysis


Making Globalization Work for Everyone


Insights


Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It


Financial Empowerment: It’s a Woman Thing


Investment Outlook


New Administration, New Realities for Investors


In Brief


U.S. Trust Focuses on Impact Investing


Bank of America Commits to Carbon Neutrality by 2020



Archive

Issue 31: 2016
Issue 30: 2015
Issue 29: 2015


Videos


Private Wealth (Keith Banks)


Investment Management Video (Hyzy)


Art in a New World (Evan Beard)


2016 Wealth and Worth Video


Philanthropic Giving (Claire Costello)


Womenomics (Vanderbrug)


Women and Climate (Vanderbrug)


Do Municipal Bonds Make Sense (David Litvack Video)


What's the Outlook for fixed income post Brexit? (Chris Gunster Video)










In This Issue






A Message From Keith Banks

Read More





Art in a New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes.
Read More





Anchored by Discipline and Patience
The investment process at Schafer Cullen.
Read More





Technology Gives Healthcare an Adrenaline Shot
A future of opportunities.
Read More





Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan
5 steps to transfer or sale of your business.
Read More





Getting Your Giving Right
Philanthropic best practices can make charitable giving more impactful.
Read More





The Ripple Effect of Brexit
The repercussions of the UK’s vote point to an uncertain future — at least for the time being.
Read More





Making Globalization Work for Everyone
The benefits of globalization must be distributed more equitably.
Read More





Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It
Deferring income may be especially rewarding this year.
Read More





Financial Empowerment: It’s a Woman Thing
Women can bolster their financial acumen underutilized resource — each other.
Read More





New Administration, New Realities for Investors
The impact of potentially pro-growth policies.
Read More





U.S. Trust Focuses on Impact Investing
A primer, a web page and more.
Read More





Bank of America Commits to Carbon Neutrality by 2020
100% renewable electricity is part of the bank’s plan.
Read More



Back
More











Art in A New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as part of an overall financial portfolio.
Read more



Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan
5 steps to ensure that the transfer or sale of your business is right for you, your business and your family.
Read more



Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It
Imminent tax cuts could make deferring income especially rewarding this year. 
Read more



Getting Your Giving Right
Adopting philanthropic best practices can make one's charitable giving both more impactful and more satisfying.
Read more



Financial Empowerment: It's a Woman Thing
U.S. Trust seminars show that women can bolster their financial acumen by tapping a powerful but underutilized resource — each other.
Read more












Keith T. Banks
A message from Keith Banks
Read more



Christopher M. Hyzy
New Administration, New Realities for Investors
Read more



Mitchell A. Drossman
Reducing the Tax Bite by Postponing It
Read more



Karen Reynolds Sharkey
Putting the Success in Your Succession Plan
Read more



Rosemary Ringwald
Financial Empowerment: It's a Woman Thing
Read more



Evan Beard
Art in a New World
Read more



Robert T. McGee
Making Globalization Work for Everyone
Read more



Joseph P. Quinlan
Technology Gives Healthcare an Adrenaline Shot
Read more



Jackie Vanderbrug
U.S. Trust Focuses on Impact Investing
Read more



Karin Kimbrough
The Ripple Effect of Brexit
Read more


Our Experts:



























































Getting Your Giving Right





"Just as they would speak with a financial advisor about their investment portfolio, collectors can now turn to private banks like U.S. Trust to unlock capital from their collection."
—Evan Beard
National Art Services Executive, U.S. Trust
Read more


Technology Gives Healthcare a Shot of Adrenaline











Client Log In | 
          Find an Office Near You | 
          Have Us Contact You | 
          Our Capabilities |
          About Capital Acumen |
          Print Archive |
          U.S. Trust Home




Bank of America Home •
              Privacy & Security

Opinions expressed are subject to change. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
 The information and views are as of the date noted, are for informational purposes only, and are not intended to address the financial objectives, situation or specific needs of any individual investor. The information presented does not constitute, and should not be construed as, investment advice or recommendations. 
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.


Investment products:


 Are Not FDIC Insured 
Are Not Bank Guaranteed 
 May Lose Value


U.S. Trust operates through Bank of America, N.A., and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.
Bank of America, N.A. and U.S. Trust Company of Delaware (collectively the “Bank”) do not serve in a fiduciary capacity with respect to all products or services.  Fiduciary standards or fiduciary duties do not apply, for example, when the Bank is offering or providing credit solutions, banking, custody or brokerage products/services or referrals to other affiliates of the Bank. Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
© 2017 Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.AR57QL4V













